The moment the kitchen door was opened, the various smells of ingredients and hot steam rushed in. The maids were too busy preparing lunch to even notice who had opened the door.

There was no need to look back.


The person who stepped into the noisy kitchen, filled with the sound of chopping and the sizzle of bubbling oil, was an ordinary maid.



A black maid's outfit brushing against the tips of her knees and a spotless white apron, along with her modest brown hair. It was a common sight in the Winston mansion, as familiar as the crystal chandeliers.

The maid picked up a wooden tray, a soup bowl, and a spoon from the dish cupboard. As she went to the shelf where colorful jars were lined up, she took a white bread and two boiled eggs from the basket, and only then did someone speak to her.



"Is that guest in the annex still there?"


Mrs. Appleby, who was in charge of the kitchen, took a freshly baked meat pie out of the oven and clicked her tongue. The young maid, as usual, pouted her lower lip slightly, pretending to be sullen.

"That's true. Still, I think I might go out today."


“Tsk tsk, Sally, you must be really having a hard time.”


As soon as Mrs. Appleby placed the meat pie on the large table in the middle of the kitchen, she extended her empty hands to a maid called Sally.

He walked straight into the cool building, descended to the basement, and walked down the left hallway as he was accustomed to. As soon as the soldier guarding the iron door in the middle of the hallway saw Sally, he opened the door for her.



The security was triple-layered. This means there was one more group that needed to be dealt with.


As I turned the corner to the right, I saw two soldiers sitting on a chair chatting.


"Hello."


"Hello, Sally."


Opposite the soldier was a pitch-black, rough iron door that was firmly locked. It exuded an atmosphere that was far removed from the luxury of the mansion's annex.

"Have you two had your meal?"


Sally approached the soldiers and smiled broadly, her eyes crinkling with delight.


"No, it's not time for the meal yet..."


The private, wearing a name tag that read 'Fred Smith' on his chest, cautiously glanced at the corporal sitting beside him and replied.



"I will bring it from the main building soon."


At a time when one was really hungry, with talk of food and the aroma of soup wafting through the air, there was no one who wouldn't bite the bait.

“What's the menu today, Sally?”


"It's a meat pie. The moment I opened the kitchen door, the savory smell was so overwhelming. I couldn't help but swallow."



The cloudy gaze of the soldier suddenly sparkled.


“Ah... isn't it the case that if we go late again, there won't be anything left?”


A private still not out of his boyhood cautiously threw out a word while watching the corporal's reactions. Then he immediately sent a sly glance toward Sally. That gaze was like a puppy asking for praise, but she pretended not to notice and only looked at the corporal's face.




“Damn it…. I'm tired of consomme soup….”
But if that face belonged to the village uncle I had known since childhood, my heart would ache even more.


"I brought the meal."


Sally walked over to the small table at the foot of the bed. In the meantime, the man tried to lift his body, but he could barely rise and let out a groan filled with pain.

She placed the tray on the table and quickly approached the man. While helping him sit in the chair in front of the table, she did not say any formal words like asking if he was okay.

Having gone through it multiple times, I now understand.


That cheap comfort, asking someone who is enduring all kinds of terrible torture with barely a thread of spirit and strength, can become a catalyst.

Without a word, I handed him a spoon and started peeling the shell of the boiled egg. The man, having all his nails pulled out, could not even do such a simple task as peeling the egg shell.

"Was there anything unusual last night? I was called to a party in the main building last night..."


"Didn't exist, cough, cough."


As the man started coughing, Sally poured water from the kettle on the table into a cup.


Still, he was fairly lucky. He was allowed one meal and water a day. Sometimes there were times when he wasn't even given water, let alone a meal.

Quenching his dry throat, the cough subsided. Sally took out a small vial from her pocket before he picked up the spoon again.



"Please eat this first."


It was a painkiller containing morphine. As if he had been waiting, the man opened his mouth, and Sally poured the pain medication into his mouth using a dropper.

I hid the vial back in my pocket and finished peeling the egg. In the meantime, I kept chatting with the man who was busy gobbling down the soup. I needed to wrap up the conversation quickly before anyone arrived, so there was no time to wait until he finished his meal.



"Have you talked about it at all?"



“……”
something I always do.


"You alone."


"Yes. Aunt Edelle quit a month ago…."


"Ha...."


Winston curled his lips gently and let out a low laugh. But his icy, cold eyes were not smiling at all.


She felt the urge to moisten her parched lips again, but Sally restrained herself. If she showed any signs of being tense, the author might notice.

"Surely, you haven't figured it out already? I have plenty of excuses to give if you ask what kind of conversation we had..."



While urgently devising all sorts of strategies in my mind, I merely blinked in wonder and tilted my head.


Winston stood between the man sitting at the table and Sally. His tall stature and build gave off an imposing presence, almost as if he were facing a barrier.

He looked down at the man, who had already started to tremble, with a briefly cold gaze before removing his sharp-cornered hat. His icy blue eyes were matched by his sleek blonde hair as his slender fingers smoothly swept through it.



"I know that too, Sally. What I mean is that's not it at all."


He suddenly turned around, lightly scolding Sally in a tone as if he were admonishing a lover. The tip of the riding whip held in his gloved hand pointed at the second lieutenant, who was almost like his aide.

“Campbell, bring those guys who are guarding the door right now.”


A chillingly low voice. In that moment, a hallucination echoed in Sally's mind as the whip sliced through the air, tearing at flesh.



Sally stood against one wall, holding the bedspread in her arms like a guilty person.


Winston leisurely looked around the torture chamber as if it were his first time seeing it while waiting for the soldiers. When he playfully held up the chains hanging by Sally and brought them near her neck, a chill ran down his spine.



I hope you bring me soon. But I hope you don't bring me.



"Captain, I have brought them."
touched up to her lower back stood on end.


What would another maid do in this situation? Quickly thinking, Sally lightly bit her lower lip and placed the back of her cold hand on one cheek.

"Please let my shyness be understood."


Private Fred Smith's trembling eyes turned a blind eye.


"That little rat-like guy...."


상병 glanced at the man stiff as a wooden block in front of the table on the opposite side of the room, then politely met the captain's gaze again.


"You said that you might pounce on Sally because you are in heat."


Sally is in heat? There's no way someone who looks like they don't even have the strength to hold a spoon can have the strength to stand something up.

Moreover, Sally was pretty in a way, but she was a dull woman with no qualities to stir a man's lascivious curiosity.


Therefore, although the reason did not resonate with him, since the superior said so, it couldn't be helped.


“Sally, did you hear that clearly?”


Winston finally removed his hand that was resting on Sally's shoulder. But just as he was trying to relax, the tip of his finger lifted her chin.



"This place is dangerous for a delicate lady."


"Yes, I will be careful."


He immediately provided the answer he wanted, but he did not let go of his chin. He simply looked down at Sally, tilting his head slightly as if to kiss her.

"You are more dangerous to me."


This time, I couldn't help but moisten my dry lips. The moment the tip of my tongue brushed against my lower lip, Winston slightly furrowed his brow and withdrew his hand from his chin.

"Did you all hear me well?"



He approached the soldiers who had violated the regulations.
Sally's blood ran cold as she followed his gaze. A small piece of eggshell was stuck under her fingernail.


Winston chuckled softly at the pile of eggshells neatly arranged in front of the spy. His eyes were not laughing at all.



Winston's closely trimmed nails dug under Sally's nails. The nails, which had penetrated deeply as if to scrape away the flesh, twisted cruelly.

Sally held back a groan as the pain crushed her delicate flesh. It had become a bad habit to endure even when it was unnecessary, as her body had been trained to withstand the agony of torture.

Winston quietly stared at the white piece stuck at the tip of my nail and flicked it away. A cold comment flew towards Sally's head along with the shell.

"Sally, you're so nice that it's annoying."




* * *





Throughout the cleaning of the annex office, a relentless gaze scanned Sally's body. It felt like a cheap nylon brush was thoroughly sweeping over her.

At times, the gaze felt like it was tickling, but in an instant, it became sharp. Unconsciously, I flinched and shuddered.



"Captain, if I am being a nuisance, shall I clean later?"


I turned back and politely asked. Winston had already turned his gaze to the documents on the desk.


The tip of the cigar wedged between his fingers was being chewed on. In the other hand, perhaps forgotten while trying to light it, was a golden lighter.

"No, keep going. I'll do my work, and you do your work."


He spat out the answer from the script in Sally's head while squinting at the documents. She, who shouldn't go out anyway, turned away again and toyed with the rag. The chewed-up cigar end kept swirling around in his mind.

"Did they imagine what it would be like to chew while looking at me?"



Suddenly, the tip of the breast hidden inside the thin bra tingled and felt warm.
The moment the door opened again, she held up a bucket full of cleaning tools with both hands as if for all to see. A group of soldiers rushed out and gave a nod to Sally.

In the middle of it all, there was a man who looked gaunter than during lunch. Dressed in prisoner’s clothes, he was being dragged along like livestock, with shackles on his limp hands and feet.

Sally sent a determined look without a hint of a smile, having read fear in his trembling eyes.


"The rescue team will definitely go."


As soon as I saw the hem of the gray coat, I immediately averted my gaze. Winston, who emerged from the torture chamber, exuded the energy of a man coming out of a brothel or cabaret.

It was a refreshing face that released the accumulated desires.


"Then please take care of me today as well."


As he lightly patted Sally's shoulder and disappeared down the hallway, she immediately began cleaning the torture chamber.



The mattress had to be replaced every time a 'guest' left. I put the mattress, which was a mess with blood and filth, out in the hallway and struggled to pull a new mattress from the storage to place it on the bed.

The management of the torture room was the most arduous and vile task in this mansion. Because of that, everyone was reluctant to take it on, but the weekly pay was correspondingly high.

For that reason, the middle-aged maid, Edell, who originally had a gambling husband, had been entrusted with it for several years.



When Sally first infiltrated this mansion as a maid, she was tasked with attending to Mrs. Winston. Dress shopping, afternoon tea with the ladies, and Mrs. Winston's whims and gossip, among others. Truly, it was hardly a worthwhile job for a spy.



So, by the time I had built a reputation as a capable worker among the employees, I pretended to be in financial trouble due to my sick mother.

Sure enough, Mrs. Belmore, the head maid, quickly assigned her to the annex. A capable maid is precious, but a financially strapped maid is dangerous. Mrs. Winston's dressing room is full of expensive items, after all.

Although Eden took charge of the torture room amicably with Ethel, she began to suspect that Sally was frequently snooping around here.



"If you're trying to win the Captain's favor that way, then stop. Do you have any idea how many kids have been kicked out for hovering around the Captain until now?"

Sally stepped out of the torture room, filled with the strong smell of disinfectant and bleach. As she moved deeper into the hallway and turned the corner, there was a laundry chute that led up to the top floor of the annex.

She opened the inlet and filled the basket with laundry soaked in blood. She was about to carry the full basket to the laundry room in the main building.

"Bristol Sheep."


Sally dropped the basket at the sudden voice that poured over her head. The willow basket fell to the floor with a thud.



“…Captain?”


When did you arrive? I didn't hear any footsteps at all.


A hot breath touched the bare nape of her neck, which was exposed as she twisted her hair up. Sally felt goosebumps rise on her forearms.

Underneath the sparse hair, a nose tip pressed in. As Winston inhaled with his nose buried in the skin, his legs trembled. He wanted to avoid it, but he was surrounded by cold walls and blocked by hot walls made of blood and flesh.



"Sally, you smell good."


All I can smell from her is blood and antiseptic.


He stepped a little closer. Sally's heart thumped violently, trapped between the wall of the entrance and Winston's chest.



"It's dangerous. This is dangerous."


As I pushed the wall with both hands, a hard object jabbed between my hips. It was easy to tell it wasn't a gun. The heat that couldn't be blocked by several layers of cloth scorched Sally's tender skin at will.

"Please, this way."


The sound of military boots echoed from around the corner. Please come this way. If there are watching eyes, Winston won't be able to do any more dirty deeds.

But the footsteps stopped just before the corner.



Now, what excuse should I use to get out of this? Sally quickly racked her brain.
"Thank you, Captain."


You have to escape while the hungry predator shows a gap. I tried to politely greet and run away, but my arm got caught on the chin.



“Don't misunderstand when I say I’m bothered. I like you.”


Is this a confession?


Sally froze in place.


"I like that courage of yours that doesn't flinch even at the sight of blood."


No, that's not it. Only then did I relax and face Winston. The corners of his straight lips held a generous smile.


"If it were another girl, she would have fainted by now. Of course, the guys would too. You're more reliable than those inexperienced rookies who are just gagging."

It was clear that the rookie he was talking about was Fred.


“Today, I pressed you for a different reason. Don't be kind to those little rats. They're cunning guys.”


Do you know? I'm that cunning little rat too.


Sally did not hide the smile that crept around her lips. After all, that greedy piglet of a monarchy will not know the true meaning of the smile.



“I want you to stay longer…”


Winston dropped his arm. His fingertips brushed up her shoulder and the neatly defined knuckles caressed her cheek.



"I wish to become a part of the torture chamber."


With a chilling remark, all senses were focused at the tips of the soft hairs standing on edge.


It means to stay long as the maid in charge of the torture chamber. It must be so. However, that cruel person uttered those horrifying words wrapped in what could be seen as kindness.

It sounded like a command to become an organ within a monster that sucks the vitality out of people.


What if not?

However, I had never heard that such a thing had happened at Winston's. The brothers of Winston were known for not giving women a glance.

The eldest son, Captain Leon Winston, is a sadistic figure who even those in the royal family who trust him find off-putting, but he is known for his polite and gentle demeanor towards women. He would never bring a woman to the torture chamber, even if it were revolutionaries.



The younger son Jerome was closer to a quiet scholar than his soldier brother. Perhaps this was due to the family's background, but his arrogant nature was no different.

He would often chase away women when they expressed private curiosity by entangling it in pretentious discussions. He loathed women who were like empty-headed porcelain dolls more than anyone else.

So, did I ever imagine when I infiltrated this mansion as a maid that one of my brothers would be after me?


A spy should not be seen as a target, nor should they be heard. Though she tries to be treated like the other maidservants, this person always liked her too much, and also disliked her too much.

I wonder where I took the wrong turn.


I found out the answer surprisingly quickly.




* * *





'It's late.'


I couldn't match the arrival time of the mail coach because of that damn pervert. Sally sprinted to the front gate of the mansion.



As I reached the point where I could hardly breathe, I saw the main gate. The mailman Peter, who had been waiting for her while chatting with the mansion's gatekeeper, peeked through the slender bars and laughed.

"You're a bit late today, Miss Bristol."


At first glance, it seemed like a generous smiling gaze, but I knew very well that it was actually filled with impatience and scolding. Because the time was urgent.

"Yes, the captain is looking for me...."



You didn't just go to play, you bastard.
A surge of curses and insults tried to burst out from within. Sally tightly shut her mouth.


"Maybe…."


For some reason, Winston, who had been staring at her eyes intently, spoke in a soft tone. The question was neither vulgar nor excessively personal, but Sally found herself wishing for rather vulgar curiosity.

“Have you ever been to Abingdon Beach when you were young?”


Avington Beach. The moment I heard that, my heart sank.


“Dirty piglet!”


The mistakes of a childhood that was nothing but immature repeated in her mind like a faded movie. Just one day of that summer tried to take away all her time a decade later.

"No. The fact that you're asking suggests you have a suspicion, but there's no certainty."


It was fortunate that they didn't slyly probe like a judo newspaper.


Stay as calm as possible. That's the only way to survive.


"Yes?"


Sally tilted her head as if it was an absurd claim.


“No… My parents are poor, so we couldn’t afford to go to such a high-end resort…”


This time, she let her words trail off sadly. As the daughter of a rural poor farmer and with only her tuberculosis-stricken mother as family, she drooped her eyes and the corners of her mouth, using the sorrow of the destitute Sally Bristol as a weight.



“……”


Winston closed his mouth again. He intently stared into her eyes, as if preparing to throw a bomb disguised as a question. Was he trying to find evidence of a lie in the eyes that held the turquoise sea of Abington Beach, or was he looking for evidence of the truth?



I want to close my eyes. But now that I would close them, nothing would change.


Winston averted his gaze only after Sally's maid uniform blouse became damp with sweat and began to cling to her skin.

simply found all of this to be a nuisance.


As the car stopped in front of the mansion, the butler of the villa walked over slowly. While Leon's personal attendant, who was sitting in the passenger seat, quickly got out to open the back seat door, the butler applied pomade to slick down his shiny hair.



“Captain Winston, I will guide you to the reception room.”


Even the greeting felt sluggish, as if I were some great lord, despite being just a housekeeper.


Leon closed the folder that he had placed on his lap and opened the black briefcase that he had set on the seat next to him. His assistant, Pierce, approached to take it, but Leon raised his hand to refuse.

I put the folder and fountain pen I was looking at on my way back in their place and picked up the black cap. I gently pressed the cap onto my neatly combed hair and even adjusted my appearance.

“Captain, if you could hurry just a bit more….”


He stepped out of the car, bending his waist thanks to the arrogant steward, and followed the steward into the villa.

Pierce, who said he would follow, was bitten. After all, he would only bring out the women anyway.


"The Duke is waiting."


However, the news that Duke Aldrich was at the Camden villa was unexpected. Upon entering the reception room, the Duke rose from a relaxed position on the sofa where he had been reading the newspaper.

"Oh, Captain Winston."


It was a stiff title to call someone who would soon become family.


"Your Highness, it's been a long time since we last met."


"Yes, have you come to pick up Rosalyn?"


"Yes."


"Hmm..."


The duke fiddled with his long, protruding mustache. His gaze openly scanned below Leon's neck.


"The serious attitude of approaching a date as if preparing for battle is quite commendable."



The Duke's words may sound like praise to the naive. However, Leon was far from naive.
As a grand princess boasting immense wealth, she surrounded herself only with expensive things, but everything looked plain in comparison to her boring demeanor. Rozalyn Eldrich was such a woman.

Even if it's boring, a mission is a mission. Even if it's a task thrown at him by the elders of the family to satisfy their own desires.



Leon approached the princess and elegantly extended his arm. The hand resting on the inside of his arm was so light that he could hardly feel it. Judging by her reluctance to make contact, it seemed this woman wasn't particularly enthusiastic about going on a date either.



“Your Excellency, I will hold off on drinking for now. The departure time of the cruise is approaching.”


"Sure, have a meaningful time."


Only the elders of the family consider this deal meaningful.


In the car running along the riverside through the city, no conversation passed between the two people sitting side by side.



Unable to bear the awkward atmosphere, Pierce started chattering away. He lightly recommended the menu of the luxury restaurant and bar on the cruise ship, even adding a wish for everyone to have a good time.

"I do not like alcohol."


The first to speak was the princess. This unexpected remark was probably due to her father offering a drink to Leon at the villa, or because Pierce was reciting the cocktail menu at the bar.

The duke was famous for being a drunkard. It was common for a woman with a drunkard for a father to dislike alcohol.



“I don't really enjoy it either.”


"Alcohol scatters a person's judgment. People say it helps forget the pains of life, but it seems to create even bigger problems. Especially in social situations, one easily loses self-control and becomes unrecognizable."

Is he under the grand delusion that he can do something by getting her drunk? The normally taciturn Grand Duchess became increasingly irritable as she began to lecture, unrequested, and Leon grew more and more displeased.



I didn't want to waste time on something called a date, which was no small matter. However, since he was in an inferior position in this transaction, it seemed that the woman knew how to ambush him and make him pregnant so that he couldn't back out of the deal.




That's unbelievable.
But the one who might receive a title someday was not Jerome. Thus, from the beginning, his younger brother was not a candidate in the marriage discussions of the grand duke family.

“If you would call me Leon instead of Captain Winston, I would be happy to do so.”


Leon gave a mischievous smile as if he were making crude advances towards a woman. Of course, it was not such a type of advance.



She is a woman with a timid side. So, she knew it was unlikely for her to call him by his name and offered the card instead. Being so principled, she probably wouldn't welcome a man's light flirtation either.

As expected.


The grand princess hesitated for a moment and simply put on an awkward smile. Her gaze turned back to the window, and silence once again enveloped the car.

Leon succeeded in making the woman withdraw her outstretched hand without committing any rudeness.


The car stopped at the dock painted with a red sunset. The river shimmered with a golden hue, and the luxury cruise ship illuminated the orange lights brilliantly.

Leon crossed to the opposite side of the car and opened the door. On the way leading the Grand Duchess to the cruise ship, he took out the ticket that Pierce had handed him.

The time to disembark from the cruise ship is four hours later. My mother’s message not to get up early from my seat is essentially written on the ticket.

"It will be a boring night."


I got into the elevator going to the top deck of the cruise ship, following a bellboy in a black uniform. As the driver pulled the lever down and the elevator smoothly ascended, it suddenly jerked to a stop and shook violently when he pulled the lever up again.



"Ah...."


The hand that had been hovering like a ghost over Leon's arm grasped him tightly. The Grand Princess looked quite flustered for a moment, but soon relaxed her grip.

The driver standing behind her winked at Leon with a smile. It seemed to be a surprise show organized intentionally for the dating couple.



"Doing something unnecessary..."



He seemed to want a tip, but he coldly turned his gaze away.
How comical it was to see someone foaming at the mouth while pulling out their right pinky nail.


"If I tell her, she will turn pale with fright."


Ah, one more thing. How amusing it is that the commander's plump, fat face has become gaunt like a mummy these days.



If I tell you, will you laugh or will you be offended?


It turned out that one of the commander’s numerous officials was a rebel spy, putting him at risk of being summoned to the royal road.



Then what about the government?


The spy is a woman. Moreover, she is acting as a prostitute under the name of the revolutionary army. It made me feel disgusted, so I passed it on to the higher-ups to handle.

The despicable ones who use women for dangerous and filthy tasks.


But can we say that he is not a cowardly person? He thinks it has nothing to do with him how women are treated from above. As long as his hands remain clean, that's all that matters.

Such dirty matters, a young lady who recites poetry and smugly stays in her corner probably doesn't need to know.


“It will be a boring story.”


The grand duchess misunderstood his tactful refusal and blushed.


"Oh, dear... I seem to have asked about military secrets."


"The fact that the western commander resembles a frog is not a secret."


The princess laughed without sincerity at the trivial joke. It was incredibly dull.


I hope that the matter of bringing in another 'Mrs. Winston' to the family is concluded soon.


It was something you would say when buying a dog to guard the house.


After the marriage, his duty as the eldest son of the family comes to an end. This meant that he no longer had to waste time on trivial things like 'dates.'

"It seems that a tough battle of wills is unfolding, given the slow pace."

As soon as the royal family returned, it was a natural course of action to deal with the traitors.


Fortunately, it was a relief that my father made remarkable contributions to the restoration of the monarchy. The Winston family only lost their title of count. They were able to retain their status and wealth as major landowners in the Camden area.



At that time, the young father was promised by the royal family that if he dedicated himself to eliminating the remnants of the rebellious forces, they would return his title. Originally a dog of the royal family, it is said that thereafter he became an even more loyal mad dog of the royal family.


And around this time, although there was a title, there was no money, so a count family made an investment for the future by marrying their daughter to Mrs. Winston.

"Everyone is incredibly foolish."


That promise has not been kept so far.


My father met an undignified end at a young age, having fallen victim to a rebel spy. After that, the duty to reclaim the title naturally fell to my eldest son, Leon.

He entered the military academy earlier than others. After commissioning, he traversed numerous battlefields and rebel hideouts, simultaneously earning the titles of war hero and vampire.

His next duty was to marry the noble lady of the family who would help him regain his title.


He grew up receiving military-style training from the moment he was born. He had become so accustomed to silently doing tasks he didn’t want to do that it no longer bothered him.

He is notorious as the vampire of Camden because the places he passes become bloody, but perhaps the nickname of Camden's loyal military dog suits him better.

"Can I call that woman a gentle lamb of the Grand Duke's family?"


Leon gazed at the Grand Duchess, who was looking out at the deck outside the window.


Compared to the Grand Duchess, the eldest son of the Winston family is far inferior in rank. Nevertheless, the Grand Duke is seriously considering this marriage proposal because the civil war has not yet ended.

It is a world where soldiers are on the fast track to success. Among the many promising young officers, the most anticipated is Leon.



The Grand Duke had just begun to rise, and while the risks were high, the potential returns were substantial; it was about buying stocks at a cheap price that had the potential for large profits. Therefore, Rosalind Eldritch was essentially a scapegoat for the Grand Duke.




Leon spoke to a woman with a dull expression again.
‘Stupid girl. Do you think I would wield a whip at you or something?’


I don't know how vicious the rumors are, but they are likely not wrong. It's just that he simply wouldn't show his true self to the Grand Duchess.

"The captain is really generous and kind."


What kind of woman would say he is generous and kind after seeing his true nature?


Sally Bristol.


I don't think it seems foolish. Rather, it looked like a fox pretending to be foolish.


The gap between the mouth that says it respects him and the eyes that say it despises him was quite something to behold. I wanted to push him into a dead end until he took off his mask and completely revealed his true self.

Then can we tell if that fox is a cunning female or a crafty swindler?


"For example..."


As the cruel impulse suddenly surged, Leon took a deep breath.


Sally lifts up the skirt of her black maid uniform and spreads her slender calves apart. Grabbing the center of her pure white bloomers forcefully, I shove my pistol into the narrow and damp intimate area that is about to be revealed.



The cold muzzle swings through the fragile flesh. Sally lets out a moan that is closer to pain than pleasure.


When I pull out the pistol from her quivering flesh, the woman's lewd fluids will pour down the shiny, wet muzzle and wet my hand.



"It's hard to bear."


Leon tightened the leg he was already twisting even more. Why does imagining that insignificant woman make him feel as if his pants are about to burst?

Is it because of those eyes?


"It was a pleasant time."



It was already close to midnight when the grand princess was dropped off at the villa.
spacious enough for four to live. With Edel gone, she was the only one left in the annex, enjoying the luxury of having it all to herself.



"Ah, what kind of wind was blowing today?"


So that's why I can express the complaints I have in my head.


There has never been a day as tedious as today spent entangled with Winston. He is quite the capricious person, but today he truly popped up here and there like a ghost, making me feel as if I was about to have a heart attack and turn into a ghost myself.



Did that beast-like intuition activate?


"Have you ever been to Abington Beach when you were a child?"


A long sigh echoed through the silent room.


Damn my eyes.


A concubine must always have an ordinary appearance. This is because she should be so unremarkable that it is difficult for people to describe her in detail when they try to envision her in their minds.

In fact, I thought I had an ordinary appearance in my own way. With my common dark brown hair and a plain expression that was hard to find any charm in, even if you looked closely.

Except for these turquoise eyes.


Other qualities as a spy can be honed through effort, but one's innate appearance is beyond control. There were limits to disguises as well.



She warned that such a day might come because of her unique eyes before being placed in this mansion. But he did not listen.



"The leadership must set an example."


James 'Little Jimmy' Blanchard Jr. A young leader of the Blanchard revolutionary army and her fiancé.


No matter what difficult task he entrusted to his fiancée, Sally never complained.


I never hoped for a life confined to quietly sitting at home, raising a child, flipping through kitchenware catalogs, and preparing a fine meal in time for my husband to come home.

I wanted to be recognized by my father as an equal companion, like my mother was, rather than being loved as a woman by my fiancé.

But he rejected Sally's plea.


"I won't raise my children like my father did. My wife won't be like my father either... Ha, damn it...."


"Are you out of your mind? There was no one as wonderful as my father."


A revolutionary army like family, and the noble cause of creating a better world for everyone. In the end, brother abandoned all of this and succumbed to the ugly reality.

It seems that only Sally feels bitter when being pointed at as a coward by comrades who were once family.


I called him once a year. To turn his heart back on the anniversary of our mother’s honorable death in action. But my brother said he had no regrets.

[Rather, I am really happy now. My mother will be proud too.]


Is that statement sincere? How could it possibly be sincere? Moreover, my mother, who dedicated her entire life to the revolution, couldn't possibly take pride in a son who cowardly ran away.

[You come out from there too. Let's live together. Masa is counting the days to live with you.]


No, that will not happen. Even if it means sacrificing my life like my mother did, I won't run away. The child that my mother will truly be proud of is me.

The bed creaked again. Sally, who had been tossing and turning unable to sleep, suddenly froze.


The sound of a man's boots echoed outside the door.


‘Who?’


At this late hour, there can be no pure intention for a man to visit a room where the maid is alone. If he wanted to send a message, he could simply pull the string located in various places around the annex to ring the bell.

Sally reached under the mattress and grabbed a small revolver. As she checked it was loaded, the heavy footsteps at the door stopped. Click, as she pushed the magazine back in, an uninvited guest knocked on the door.

“…Who are you?”


Sally pretended to wake up briefly and asked. She felt a little relieved that the door had at least been knocked on. If the doorknob had been turned without warning, it would have been unambiguously sinister intent.


"It's me."
"Ah.... So, in the study with Lieutenant Campbell...."


"Sally."


"Yes?"


I saw other soldiers playing billiards at night, so I was going to say to go there, but Winston interrupted me.


“Hello, Sally.” The voice was heavier than when casually greeting her. Sally tightened her grip on the foot that stepped on the wedge and extended her index finger beside the revolver's trigger.

“I've done my part, so you should do yours.”


An ominous sense of intimidation emanating from the incomprehensible directive pressed down on her as it crossed through the narrow gap of the doorway. Sally slowly drew out the muzzle of the revolver lodged at her hip.

"I'm not sure what you mean...."


"Finish the cleaning you were doing."


My head went blank.


“…Yes?”


“Office.”


Sally swallowed a weary sigh. The muzzle of the revolver was once again quietly tucked at her waist.


"What did you say? Cleaning the office?"


I always thought he was not in his right mind. But has he really gone insane?


She stared blankly at the silhouette, which still did not show much of an expression, and took a deep breath.


"Have you been drinking or are you just insane?"


However, there was no smell of alcohol at all.


In the middle of the night, after midnight no less, to wake the maid and tell her to finish cleaning the office. If the office were a mess like a pigsty, it might be different, but that's the place Sally cleans with the most effort after the torture chamber.

The office was indeed a mess comparable to a pigsty.


Between the desk and the coffee table, a large black stain marked the red carpet. Should I consider it kindness that I am not being asked what that stain is? An ink bottle was still lying over there, toppled over.

Crazy bastard.


That crazy bastard was confidently sitting behind the desk, smoking a cigar.


I don't know if there's some ulterior motive, or if it's just venting frustration at the poor maid because things aren't going well.



“Did you come? You said you would just get dressed, but it took a long time.”


If the opponent were an ordinary person, they would have felt relieved seeing that bright smile. However, the author is a person who laughs while witnessing a prisoner being chased by a bloodthirsty military dog.

I didn't have a good feeling.


I looked around the study before coming here, but there was no one since everyone must have gone to bed. I considered waking Fred, who was sleeping on the first floor, but I decided against it for fear that the soldiers sharing the room might find it suspicious.



Then I guess I'll have to put them to sleep with a sleeping pill.


Sally placed the bucket filled with cleaning tools next to the stain. She then pretended to accidentally glance towards the desk, making a look that suggested she had made a mistake.

"Ah... I'm sorry. I will bring something to drink right away."


On the desk, there should always be a bottle of sparkling water and a glass that Winston always drinks from. I haven't returned it since I took the tray with me when I went out during the day.

"No, I don't need it."


As soon as she turned around, his words blocked Sally's retreat.


"Come this way."


I turned to look at Winston. As our gazes caught in the hazy, ghost-like smoke, he flicked his straightened finger towards Sally.



The steps towards the desk holding the bucket again were cautious. It felt like walking on thin ice, not on a soft carpet.

I hesitated to grasp the hand stubbornly extended toward me, as if it were a person come to collect a debt. If I stepped on the desk, erasing the footprints would also become Sally's responsibility.

I leaned on the desk and lifted one foot back. I pulled on the thin shoelaces, effortlessly loosening them, and gently tugged down on the heel of the shoe with my hand.

Until the moment the foot wrapped in white stockings slipped out of the black shoes, Winston couldn't take his eyes off as if taking off the shoes was an interesting sight.

His eyes examined even this mundane event as if it were news.


The only way to quickly escape from uncomfortable gazes was to promptly do what was asked and leave. Sally grabbed his hand without hesitation and placed her knees on the desk.

"Ah…."


Just as Winston's hand fell away, it was the moment Sally was trying to get up with one foot planted on the desk. Her left foot, which was sticking out from the edge of the desk, was grabbed. As her body swayed from that, Sally urgently supported herself with both hands on the desk.


I lay on my stomach in a half-hearted posture like an athlete just before the start, looking back over my shoulder.

Would she lift her skirt? I reached back with one hand and pressed down on the hem of the skirt, but I missed.


His gaze was in a completely different place.


"Captain?"


Winston suppressed a laugh, his gaze fixed on Sally's toes. His thick thumb delicately touched the soft flesh between the thin stockings, gently gliding along the gentle curves. A shiver ran from Sally's toes to the nape of her neck.



The touch felt like it was deliberately tickling, making it seem as if a moan of pain would escape. If that happened, it would surely lead to a confusing misunderstanding. She bit down firmly on her lips.

As I pulled my foot, wanting him to let go, his gentle touch changed. Winston gathered his long fingers together and wrapped them around Sally's foot, then asked.

"What are you going to do with the money I gave you?"


Sally's resistance stopped at the unexpected topic. What could be the intention behind suddenly bringing up money?




"Mom's hospital bills..."
Sally quickly dusted off the chandelier, filling her mind with all sorts of vulgar words I knew.


Son of a bitch. Eat dust.


I unnecessarily dusted the ostrich feathers at the end of the duster over Winston's golden crown. However, no matter how hard I looked, the dust wouldn't fall off. It had only been a few days since I cleaned the chandelier.

I had no choice but to finish quickly and go down. It was when I gave up on petty revenge and turned my back while dusting off the front of the chandelier.

"That's right."


A low murmur brushed against the calves wrapped in thin stockings.


“Excuse me?”


In a moment of surprise, a creaking sound was heard. Looking down, Winston was sitting back at a distance against the chair's backrest, pretending not to have done anything.

The cigar held in hand was not smoked but only burned, and a gray ash chunk was dangling from the end of the short cigar.



“No, it's just me talking to myself.”


"Oh, yes...."


The maid smiled politely. But the moment she turned her head, the turquoise eyes cried out. I despise you.


Leon brushed the cigar ash off the ashtray and smiled skewed.


White.


This evening, my imagination matched with the Grand Duchess as we sat face to face. Sally's bloomers were white.


Now that I've checked the color of the underwear, it's only natural that I want to check the color of what's inside.


Could it be the color of my imagination?


I want to reach into that black skirt and white petticoat and quickly tear apart the tight seam in the middle of the bloomer.




Leon ran the tip of his tongue over his smooth lower lip and suddenly bit it sharp with his teeth.
As Sally tilted her head slightly, his gaze pointed to the ashtray beneath his chin. The ashtray, made of black marble, held the remnants of the high-quality cigar that Winston had just wasted, embedded in the ashes.

"I can use the excuse of emptying the ashtray to go out."


Sally approached Winston with a light step, reaching for the ashtray, and froze like a stone.


A hand with thick tendons and veins smoothly stood out as it slowly slid beneath the desk. And the bronze object held in that hand also had tendons and veins that were smoothly pronounced.

"Wow!"


Bang. The ashtray slipped from Sally's hand and fell to the edge of the desk.


The black marble shattered into pieces, and fragments flew. Reflexively, she closed her eyes, and as soon as she opened them, Sally regretted it.

I shouldn't have opened my eyes.


Winston still held a copper-colored object in his hand.


At first, I thought it was a cigar. It was held casually in hand as if it were just an ordinary object, and the color and shape were similar as well.

But how could a cigar be as thick as Sally's wrist?


It's chilling to think that I was secretly masturbating in the same room as the maid who was cleaning. But what’s even more chilling is the fact that I was confidently holding my genitals even after being caught.

'This horny lunatic is really….'


Until now, calling Winston a lunatic was half true and half an insult. But at this moment, it has become an absolutely perfect truth.



A lunatic that should be committed to a mental hospital immediately.


Sally held back the tears that were welling up.


To overthrow the corrupt monarchy and ensure that everyone enjoys a more equal and just world, I have taken on all sorts of dirty and unpleasant tasks. But is witnessing the enemy's filthy, thick member also a sacrifice for that great cause?




It even made me feel a sense of doubt that I had never experienced before.
“…What are you talking about?”


She swallowed hard and asked back.


"What you can do."


Before she could respond, a long finger wrapped around Sally's forearm. Suddenly, her body spun around, and she had to face Winston. Their noses were close enough to touch each other's chests. Sally lowered her head to cover her nose and tightly shut her eyes.



Crazy guy. Crazy guy. Crazy guy.


Are you still holding that out?


"Don't you know?"


Sally quickly shook her head while closing her eyes tightly enough to create a deep crease between her eyebrows. At her satisfying answer, the corner of Leon's mouth, which had been raised on one side, formed a perfect symmetry.



He lightly grasped the maid's chin and pressed her cheeks with his thumb and index finger. The soft flesh sank in, and her pink lips slightly parted.

Sally finally opened her eyes wide and met his gaze. The eyes are the window to the truth. Leon persistently dug into the truth and falsehood within her mysterious turquoise eyes.

"I can do anything you want...."


As Sally tried to close her mouth, she pressed harder on the finger that was pinching her cheek. A faint moan escaped from her saliva-moistened lips, making it even harder to take my eyes off that crimson opening.

I wonder if it would be nice to see the blood flowing from being bitten by those sharp teeth.


Leon put his index finger in Sally's mouth and pressed down on her soft tongue. Whether it was the pottery that was making her feel this way, the woman flinched and desperately tried to break away from him.

A woman with a big heart.


At this point, it would be reasonable to be terrified and cry. However, his dry eyes were still shouting that they wanted to tear his fingers apart and chew them up.

"Have you ever put something like this in a mouth that has spoken such filthy words?"



I swept up the object I was holding in my other hand. As I took a step closer, the woman was startled and stepped
Sally secretly clenched her fist. She wanted to pound that sharp nose with her fist until it turned into a big, swollen nose. But that shouldn't be done, so she relaxed her hand.

This time, instead of turning around, Winston walked up to Sally. In his hand was the handkerchief that had wiped away Sally's tears in the interrogation room at lunch.

Is it finally asking me to suck it?


I eagerly extended my hands in anticipation of receiving it, but the handkerchief landed next to my lips instead of Sally's hand.



"Sally, I'm bleeding."


The moment the ashtray broke, my cheek stung. I completely forgot about the injury due to the numbness of all my senses from what was happening right in front of me.

He gently wiped away the wounds with an unexpectedly tender touch. The kinder Winston became, the more uneasy I felt. His true nature is far from kindness.

Hey, please return to being the incredibly arrogant person you originally were. Can't you treat some insignificant maid like that as a mere consumable of the mansion's machine, as you always do?

Winston was unaware that Sally was glaring at him. His gaze was fixed on the red stain on the silk handkerchief.


"I will suck it up..."


As I reached out my hand towards the handkerchief, he lifted his gaze. The moment our eyes met, Sally's intuition screamed.



This is dangerous.


Winston grabbed her chin as she recoiled. His lips came directly forward. Just before their lips were about to touch, she panicked and tried to turn her head away. It was Winston who had turned Sally's head to the side first.

His lips grazed the cheek, just a fingertip away from the corners of his mouth. It was a place with a wound.

Immediately, the soft flesh, warm and moist, licked at the skin, causing a sharp pain to arise.


The hot breath spilled over her cheek. Sally froze as if she had been hit by a fierce winter storm.


Winston pulled his lips away, but Sally stood frozen in a daze. The nickname of vampire was by no means a metaphor. Winston's breath became ragged after tasting her blood. It was distinctly different from the steady breathing he had just moments ago when he was stroking his genitals in front of her.


His sharp gaze was also disheveled. He tightly closed his eyes as if suppressing something and bit down on his lower lip. After his throat moved up and down once, he let out a sigh and opened his eyes wide.

"I'm still curious about what we can do together."


"Captain, please send it."


"Why is that? Ah, that's right."


Winston took Sally's firm rejection lightly. A tidy hand delved into the inside of the officer's jacket and pulled out a black object, placing it on Sally's chest, which lay on the desk.

"I'm someone who makes sure to repay as much as I do for revenge."


What he gave was a wallet filled with bills, heavy and substantial. He is a man who despises women who spread their legs for money. So why does he force her to spread her legs while handing her money?

I just hope that his exam hasn't ended yet....


“Captain, it seems like something happened to me during the day. I have someone I want to marry. I don't want to betray them.”



Ignoring Sally's pleas, a hand suddenly intruded into the hem of her skirt that had risen up over her knees.


"Sally, the more you say things like that, the more heated it gets. Don't you know men well? Or perhaps you know them too well."



“Captain! Stop!”


It was the moment when he was about to kick his weak point. As her hand climbed up her thigh and grasped something, Sally froze in terror. The light smile on Winston's face vanished in an instant.

“This is... what is it?”


The object embedded below the band of the right stocking suddenly shot out. The moment the silver revolver revealed its muzzle outside the black skirt, Sally's heart raced heavily.

Calm down. You need to stay calm.


As Sally slowly raised her upper body, Winston brought the revolver up before his eyes. The cold gaze that had been fixated on the absurdly small gun shifted beyond it to Sally's face.

"What is this, I would have asked."


It's a pistol. If you act like a fool like this, today his shallow patience might completely run out. After he loses his rationality, even Winston won't know Sally's fate.

Winston examined the revolver closely with keen eyes. He opened the chamber of the revolver, removed the bullets to check them, and discovered that the serial number, which should have been engraved between the chamber and the barrel, was erased, causing him to smirk. Sally's heart raced even faster.


"Have you ever shot?"


He, who has handled firearms countless times, would know. That revolver is a well-maintained item. If he says he has never shot it and only has it because his fiancée gave it to him, he would instantly recognize that as a lie.

“Just once or twice… like playing around with a can….”


"And?"


"A month ago, I encountered a mugger downtown...."


"Did you get it right?"


"Yes...."


Winston burst out laughing as if it was fun and asked.


"Me?"


"Yes?"


"Did you mean to shoot?"


Sally stared with eyes gleaming with cruel mischief, slowly and resolutely nodding her head. She knew it would be a lie if she said otherwise.

"Ha…."


Winston burst into laughter again, but it was different from the laughter a moment ago. As he laughed, he bit down on his lower lip, and there was a faint hint of embarrassment in his demeanor.

"Me? That's interesting."


The magazine clicked shut. There was still a faint sense of bewilderment in the words spat out in a tone of disdain.


"If you shoot, you die."



“…Yes.”
“Don't, get, kicked, out, it, can't, happen.”


Wiping tears with her sleeve, she peeked and saw that Winston's pants were sagging at the front. Sally sobbed even harder.



"Captain, sob...."


It's boring.


Leon looked at the woman crying like a child with cold eyes and let out a sigh mixed with annoyance. Since she was acting like a child, her disheveled clothing and the legs that hung limply at the end of the desk didn't seem strange.

You have to keep biting me until the end.


A mouse cornered should bravely charge at the cat to make it interesting. Completely losing its will to fight and just squeaking away diminishes the fun.

I should have jumped at the chance when he made that bold confession about wanting to kill him. Instead, I dragged it out by teasing him unnecessarily, and the mood cooled off.

"Go take a look."


The moment he commanded in a blunt manner, the woman lifted her face which had been buried in her sleeves. Her eyes were round and wide, the area around them red, and her nostrils twitched as she tried to suppress her sobs. She looked like a mouse that had seized an opportunity.


Try going once. Try running away from me.


Leon licked his lips quietly, like a cat just before pouncing on its prey.


“…Am I being kicked out?”


This foolish little mouse...


A long sigh escaped through the gap in his lower lip.


As soon as I was told to go, I would rush out as if I had been waiting for it, and I intended to grab and throw them down on the carpet just like that. Because I knew they would want it again.

Yet, to ask if I am being kicked out. The audacity of acting so bold now seems utterly pathetic, extinguishing even the slightest interest I had.


"Don't chase me away. So please go."
Deviation.


It was unfortunate that his first deviation and his father's final deviation met an unhappy ending. Since then, Leon could not suppress the impulse to taste blood again.

Although it was a path already determined before I could put forward my intentions, walking the path of a soldier was the right choice. Because what starts as a private interest soon becomes a public achievement.

Should I be thankful to the girl named Daisy?


Daisy. It was a surprisingly cute name that did not match her dark skin and bold temperament at all.


Actually, Sally might be her real name.


Every time I looked into Sally's eyes, I felt a sense of suspicion. Although her skin tone was much whiter than that of the other child and her dark brown hair was common, her teal-colored irises were rare.

If Sally is that girl, I have finally found the reason why I lose my reason and feel an urge to wrap a chain around her slender neck and hang her from a hook.

Sally. This name is also charming, which does not match her boldness.


Leon roughly opened the drawer again. The small revolver was sitting alone next to the case where his father had carefully collected his medals.

To the question of whether she was about to shoot, she nodded gravely without a moment's hesitation. It was amusing how she boldly challenged others despite being so small.

Leon quietly smiled and picked up the revolver.


Where was I aiming to shoot? Since I had just kicked between the legs right before discovering the gun, could it be that direction?



When did I resolve to shoot me instead? Every time we met, did he slowly draw the muzzle embedded in the band of those old stockings?



Just before he was about to kiss her, the image of Sally cautiously putting her right hand into her pocket suddenly came to mind.



A fox pretending to be stupid. Now that it's been found out, the fox is incredibly foolish.


Sally Bristol.


On the outside, she appeared obedient, but hidden beneath her neat skirt was a dangerous object, and she was contemplating the thought of shooting him at any moment—a perilous maid.

Next, Leon's breath became rough as he imagined the place to torment. He hooked his straight index finger onto the tightly knotted black tie and pulled it loose.

The handkerchief was stained with thick blood, spreading into his essence. The traces of Sally spread like veins between the clear marks, clinging to Leon's most sensitive points. The mysterious scent of the woman's blood mixed with his essence stimulated his keen sense of smell. He tightened his grip on the handkerchief, imagining smeared Sally's blood on his genitals.



The thin membrane blocking the narrow opening might be pink like lips.


When I grab my waist with both hands and align the tip of my doppelgänger with that membrane, Sally will scream that it can't be done. Struggling to close my legs which I can't do because of the handcuffs, unaware of how lewdly I'm shaking my breasts.



Then I suggest to the child. Generously. If you beg me to quit, I will quit. Then will you immediately start flattering and begging?



In fact, I don't need anything like that, and I will suddenly pull down my waist. If I tear the mucous membrane with my body in one go, that mouth that was pleading will surely hurl all kinds of curses at me.

Would the sensation in the belly be as good as that in the mouth? He recalled the moment he stirred within Sally's mouth, tightening his grip.

It is to thrust all the way into that moist belly at once. Until the sound of breath escaping slips out from between Sally's torn lips.



I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


"Haah…"


The moment the white and murky fluid burst out and soaked into the bloodstains, Leon let out a sigh. It wasn't just a relief mixed with the satisfaction of alleviating the desires that had tormented him all day.

“…Didn’t you say it was annoying because you were too nice?”


The woman was kind and misunderstood the meaning of the phrase "to be irritating."


Well. It’s probably hard for you to understand that it bothers me that you’re too nice to be put in the torture room.


No matter how infamous a torturer he was, he had his own principles. First, women are not tortured. Second, one does not bring innocent people to the torture chamber.

The problem was that Sally fell under both of these principles.



One must tear apart the legs of a diligent ant carrying a piece of bread, and by the time the third leg is torn off, one
It was a suitable day for going out. I don't know what whims April's weather, unpredictable as it is, might throw at us, just like Winston.



It was a 10-minute bike ride to the nearest town, Hale Wood, from Winston Manor. Sally parked her bicycle in front of the three-story brick building after passing by a general store with a big discount sign.

Just as the lunch break seemed to be over, my eyes met those of the postmaster, who was turning the "Closed" sign on the window to display "Open." The middle-aged man lifted his glasses with his index finger, greeted Sally with a nod, and then promptly opened the door for us.


"Good afternoon, Miss Bristol."


"Hello."


Sally hesitated as she stepped inside. The staff of this small town post office included four people, including the chief, but for some reason, today there were only three.

"Is Mr. Peter taking a day off?"


"Today, I'm at the station because the postal train is delayed."


Peter, disguised as a mail carrier, wanders around the village all day, but he always eats lunch here. So he came specifically to match the time, but today, of all days, there is none.

I brought the money I received from Winston yesterday to send it to the headquarters as military funds. I had Peter handle the remittance in a way that it couldn't be traced. It was risky to share any information about the recipient with other employees, even if it was disguised information.


“Just wait a little, it will come soon, haha.”


As Sally clutched the old bag strap and sighed, the postmaster rubbed his long mustache with his fingertips and smiled. The postal workers thought that Sally had a rosy affection for Peter.

That's impossible.


Although I dressed modestly due to my mission, my discerning eye for men was anything but modest.


"Shall I spend some time and come back?"


Just pass two buildings from here, and you'll find Madame Benoit’s café. It was a moment when I thought I might indulge in a little luxury after a long time. A middle-aged woman came in, pulling three small children into the cramped post office.



Soon, the voices of the lady and the children made it quite noisy. Sally paused as she was about to go out and entered the phone booth in the corner.

It was quite surprising, as if they were expecting to hear Peter or Fred's voice in Hale Wood.


[Is something wrong?]


He headed straight to the point with his fiancée, whom he hadn't heard from in a while, without any particular greeting. The conversation continued in a roundabout way, without mentioning her name, as the intermediary might still be listening in on the call.



“I want to go home.”


Jimmy will know too. The whining tone is just a disguise. Sally doesn't act like a child.


[What's wrong? What about Mom's hospital bills?]


The phrase "Mom's hospital bills" had to be corrected to "Your mission."


"The employer is strange."


[What do you mean it's weird?]


"Did you forget what I said before I came here?"


I can't have forgotten the time I was warned repeatedly about meeting Winston at Abington Beach when I was young. A long sigh came through the receiver.

[But you haven't been fired yet.]


Since I haven't been arrested yet, isn't it true that I haven't been caught?


"I might be cut soon."


[No, deny it. You're doing well. There won't be any evidence anyway. Isn't that right?]


This time, Sally let out a long sigh into the receiver.


[We need you.]


Jimmy knows well what words his fiancée is most vulnerable to. They have grown up together since they were infants, so they are like real siblings.


"But..."
clear evidence on the office floor with a handkerchief he used to wipe it.


Even though he was my fiancé who was like family, this kind of talk was too shameful.


"I don't have time."


The phone bill will soon run out. A heavy sigh was heard from the receiver as Jimmy issued a command in a voice that chided his lover.



I'm at a friend's house. I'll talk a bit with the adults and then call.


I need to discuss this with the executives, so I was told to wait at the safe house in Winsford, which is an hour away by tank from here. Sally immediately hung up the phone and stepped out of the booth.

Should I send the money next time? Peter still hasn't returned. Sally nodded to the postmaster and headed outside the post office.



On the way to the tram station, I stopped by Madame Benoit’s café.


"Please wrap this and this."


The tight budget made it difficult to afford two slices of cake at an upscale café. However, I wanted to treat Nancy, Fred's sister and my childhood friend who works at the inn, to a little luxury as well.

I tied my bicycle to the pole at the tram station and got on the tram heading to Winsford. As I sat by the window and gazed blankly outside, the idyllic scene of sheep grazing in the grass quickly transformed into a vast industrial area belching black smoke.



Once, this place was an apple orchard. The landlord cut down all the apple trees over ten years ago and sold the land to an auto parts company.

As technology advances, those who own land have become increasingly wealthy, while those who farmed that land have become poorer. Being driven off the farms and working in factories, they endure intense labor for dozens of hours without seeing a single ray of sunshine, and the meager wages they earn are inevitably squandered on the cost of living.



The buildings that brushed past my eyes gradually grew taller. The gap between the rich and the poor, which is not noticeable in a small rural village, becomes more pronounced as one approaches a large city.

As Sally saw the grand opera house, she got off the tram. While walking through the bustling crowd going about their ways, she came across a large department store.

A young woman draped in a luxurious marten fur coat that seemed out of place for the mild weather was walking towards a taxi on the roadside, holding the hand of a boy about ten years old. In the boy's hand was the train set that had recently gained fame as a gift from a foreign royal family to the youngest prince.



A boy of the same age, standing by the roadside, was gazing with blank eyes. Around the boy's neck, who had coal
Due to the mannequin dressed in a glamorous gown that was ten times her weekly salary standing beyond the glass, she looked not just plain, but almost shabby.

"Don't grow up beautifully. Don't dress up prettily. Don't attract anyone's attention."


Sally, who unknowingly imagined herself in that glamorous dress, heard her mother's voice softly echoing in her mind.



"Anyway, I'm not a beauty like my mother who makes all the men on the street turn around at least once."


Because her mother was away for long periods due to her duties, Sally was raised by the revolutionary community. Whenever she happened to return home, Sally would pretend to sleep in her bed. This was because her mother always acted stiffly when Sally was awake or in front of others.


She sat on the bed and stroked Sally's head when she fell asleep. It was a tender touch that was hard to feel on ordinary days.



"Don't grow up beautifully. Don't dress up nicely. Don't catch anyone's eye."


My mother always repeated the same words like a mantra. Whether those words were merely a meaningless monologue said in a drunken state, whenever someone bought Sally cosmetics or pretty accessories, she not only disliked them but even went so far as to throw them directly into the trash.


When Sally's father bought her red lipstick for her fifteenth birthday, she was so furious that she even threw a wine glass at him.



When I was young, I felt a bit resentful. My mother's vanity drawer was packed with colorful cosmetics, and her wardrobe was filled with expensive dresses and shoes that I didn't know where she got the money to buy.

"Then why did that happen to me?"


I want to ask, but my mother was not a person of this world. Whatever the reason, the fact that my mother was a great revolutionary soldier remains unchanged.

"You are a great revolutionary too."


Sally stared silently at her reflection in the glass and smiled faintly. Because of riding her bicycle, her hair was a bit tousled, so she smoothed it down with her hand and murmured to herself.

This is the path I have chosen.




* * *

Of course, information could have leaked from the escort unit or other departments of the headquarters.


But what if not?


If someone under Leon's command has betrayed him, their path will also lead to a cliff.


That can't be.


He was not so naive as to just hope it wasn't true. He had to find and bury it before the higher -ups did. It meant he needed to dig into the fact that his subordinate had ratted him out and also bury the body of the one who had snitched somewhere.



Campbell?


Leon softened his gaze that had been fixated on Campbell's neck.


The author would never do that.


Campbell has been a vassal of the Winston family for hundreds of years. With the position of vassal now obsolete, he was starting a military supply business with the help of the Winston family. So, it means that Lieutenant Campbell is a dog that Campbell himself sent from the Campbell family for Leon to use as he pleases.


I guess I need to give instructions.


After arriving last time, I was thinking of subtly giving instructions when the colonel was away. To have him thoroughly understand the recent activities of the soldiers assigned to the Domestic Information Division and to my annex.



"And...."


Leon's pupils widened in an instant as he casually turned his head towards the window.


Why is that woman over there….


The maid was standing on the crowded sidewalk.


Amidst the bustling crowd, the woman was rummaging through her brown handbag, seemingly preoccupied with something. If I hadn't thought that her back view was strangely familiar due to her not wearing the usual black maid outfit and having let down her hair, I might not have recognized her at all.


It's bothersome because I'm too kind.


Leon frowned slightly. The woman took out some bills from her handbag and suddenly handed them to the beggar standing in front of the department store.

"Even if it's that daughter, we're going to show that woman in hell what we're made of. Colonel Winston in heaven would also be proud of you."

The woman had two children with the surname of the rebel 'Royal Family,' Rideul. The eldest son was predicted to lead the upper echelon like 'Little Jimmy,' following in his father's footsteps, but he abandoned the rebels the moment both parents died.



He has now given up all the power and wealth afforded to him by the top brass and has become a laborer on a rural farm. Although he disguised his identity, it didn't take long for Leon to track him down.

The rat must be caught. But what about the rat that has turned traitor?


He was no minor player but a big shot, so I placed him under surveillance, knowing that the rebels' leadership or his sister would approach him someday. To ensure that the mouse left loose could attract more mice.

"It would be worth seeing if the little leaders get caught. There are more than ten of those who are gnashing their teeth at the leaders' little ratlings, just in the West."

Among the notorious rats of Reed, only one remained now.


Little Riddle.


Neither their real name, appearance, nor age has been revealed.


Every time I interrogated the rebels, I made sure to ask about the last leader, but no one said anything. It seemed that the rebel leadership, whose whereabouts were unknown, was more frightening than the torturer standing in front of me with a dull pair of pliers.



What is that woman, anyway?


So the military referred to the mysterious woman as Little Riddle, which means 'little riddle.'


If she resembles my mother, she would be a beauty with blonde hair and hazel eyes. She would probably be as cunning and wicked as my mother. Surely, she is somewhere selling her body to military officers to extract information.




* * *





I slipped out through the back door of the department store and walked through the alleyways tangled like a spider's web. The other side of the glamorous shopping district was gray. Dilapidated buildings primarily inhabited by the poor working class lined the streets. Only the sound of Sally's shoes echoed in the empty alley.



No one had paid any attention to Sally until she reached the red brick building in the alley. For the people here,
Then they would pry into the reason for the withdrawal. I was worried that the reason might reach Fred, who was disguised as Nancy's brother and Winston's subordinate infiltrator. He was still inexperienced, and I didn't know what kind of trouble he might cause.



"It's nothing."


"Ugh... But what is this?"


Nancy furrowed her brows and tapped the side of my lips with her fingertips. Noticing that it referred to the scar on my cheek, Sally also furrowed her brows and changed the subject.

"I got scratched while working. Isn't there any coffee?"


Soon the two of them chatted over two pieces of cake and a mug of steaming hot coffee.


Sally cut the cake with a fork and put it in her mouth.


An almond cake filled with vanilla custard cream between cake layers covered with thinly coated caramelized almond slices.



This cake was the culprit that made one swallow their saliva at the mere mention of the name Madame Benoit. She marveled at the taste of sweet clouds melting in savory sunlight.

"Isn't it really fantastic?"


"How is it that such a talented person is hiding in a backwater like this?"


Nancy tasted another cake topped with raspberry jelly and nodded her head.


"Thanks to Winston, I'm able to eat and live. Every time there's a party, he puts in an enormous order."


“Ah, by the way, is Fred doing well?”


"Yes, it seems like nothing special is happening."


I didn't mention the story of how I barely managed to handle the situation yesterday, where I almost got whipped by Winston because of me.

"Ugh, I'm worried that guy is so timid."



"Well... it seems like Uncle Bobby was shocked by this."
[Thank you for worrying about me.]


“Of course. Uncle is like family to me.”


No matter how accustomed she was to such matters, Sally had a warm heart. There was no way she could be happy about having to coldly turn her back on his suffering due to the mission she was assigned.

"Then, please take a good rest and recover your strength quickly, and when you go home, give my regards to Aunt Hetty...."



Just as she was about to say her goodbyes to hang up the phone, Uncle Bobby suddenly interrupted. What could it be that he called her by her real name, lowering his voice, instead of her alias?

“…Yes?”


[Are you playing the role of that devil's government?]


"Yes?"


Sally was momentarily speechless at the ridiculous speculation. Could it be that Winston's friendly behavior in the interrogation room yesterday led to this misunderstanding?

"Uncle, there’s no way I would do such a thing with that dirty guy."


[Did you not give the order from above?]


"You're aware that such an assignment wouldn't come from the higher-ups, especially not from my fiancé."


I'm sorry, but it appears that the text you provided is incomplete. Could you please provide the full text you would like me to translate?



"Uncle."


[Are you in contact with Jo?]


He suddenly asked if she was in contact with the brother who left and abandoned his comrades. To Sally, he is family, but to the comrades, he is a traitor. While she hesitated and couldn't answer, the uncle made a request that was hard to understand.



[Go to Jo. And don't come back again.]


I don't know how I hung up the phone. Sally placed the receiver back down and stared at the stain in the corner of the coffee table.

At that moment, the pencil held in Sally's hand snapped in half.


A beauty trap, you say? The revolutionary army does not resort to such filthy tricks.


"Are you out of your mind?"


When I raised my voice, I heard the sound of a chair scraping in the kitchen. It seemed that Nancy was coming this way.



[You know this is a rare opportunity. It will be a great help in stopping that guy. It will also make it easier to obtain important information. And when it no longer serves its purpose someday, it will be easy to dispose of as well.]

"That's ridiculous."


[It's not about him and growing up.]


Sally brushed her face and let out a hollow laugh.


"Then? Does that mean I can do anything as long as I don't go that far?"


As soon as she pressed the receiver close to her mouth and mocked, Nancy walked out from the kitchen. Seeing her friend leaning against the doorframe with a worried expression, Sally turned her back and cupped the receiver in her hand.



[That's not what I mean. Try to avoid it skillfully and coax them well. If you do it right, you might be able to manipulate them.]



“How am I supposed to avoid it? I'm not someone who can think clearly. How am I supposed to control that… Are you really talking about humans like us right now?”

[No time to argue. From now on, you don’t have to send money. You will need it.]


It meant to buy cosmetics or clothes necessary to seduce Winston with a weekly allowance.


"What? I don't need it. Why have you changed so much? You've never resorted to such dirty tactics before."


[You are too much of an idealist. Sometimes I wonder if you are really the companion of my life.]


"What does that mean?"


What I mean is that I need to be assured that you will understand no matter what I confide in you. Our work is dirtier, more painful, and more shameful than you think. Sometimes, a heart-wrenching dedication is necessary.

As I silently watched the employee's fingers busily dancing over the typewriter, Jimmy's earlier words echoed in my mind.



[From now on, you don't have to send money. It will be needed.]


It's all right. I don't need it.


In the end, the money taken from Winston was not used as headquarters' military funds or as Sally's official funds.


Sally's nephew, whom she has never seen, will be able to have a happy Easter. That was a bit of comfort.


Still, I wanted to wander around because I felt awful. But now that I had no gun, it was dangerous to walk the dark streets alone.



On the way back to the mansion from Hailwood, my hair and clothes became wet and damp due to the fickle April shower. Could I feel any more weighed down than this?

I pulled my bicycle into the private back entrance reserved for the mansion's employees. The sun had set, and the garden was dimly lit by sparse electric lights. Sally walked toward the gloomy annex, with her back to the main building, from which dazzling lights were pouring out.


When I entered beyond the wall of the annex, Winston's car was not there. I looked up while leaving the bicycle in the shed in the backyard, but the lights in both the office and the bedroom were off.

Hasn't he/she returned yet?


The revolver that was still 'seized' in the drawer of the office briefly crossed my mind. But I quickly shook off the thought.



He, who always locks the drawer, didn't lock it today. He couldn't have simply forgotten. That was a trap left open on purpose for someone to steal.

As Sally climbed the stairs to the attic, she let out a long sigh.


I couldn't find a new gun. No matter where I hid it on my body, Winston's filthy hands would feel around and find it.


What excuse will they use to call me out tonight and what dirty deed are they planning?


Rescue operation, bomb installation, burglary of the royal villa.


I have taken on all kinds of dangerous missions, but this is the first time I felt the urge to escape.



"Damn it, Jimmy. You’re still my fiancé after that?"
Winston went to the governor the day after the operation, and he hasn't returned even after three days have passed today.



"Never return."


A beam of scarlet sunset light seeped through the gap in the curtains that covered the long window. Given that there was still no call from Lieutenant Campbell to have something ready to suit Winston's mood even at this hour of dusk, it seemed likely that he would not return today either.


Winston has been sleeping in the annex bedroom rather than the main building for the past few months. Because of this, Sally has become incredibly busy managing even his personal belongings.

Sally, who had just taken the officer's uniform from the laundry cart and hung it neatly in the closet, frowned upon recalling the trivial lewd jokes from the laundry room a moment ago.

"The button thread is all frayed, isn't it?"


The maids in charge of the laundry giggled, saying they had to sew Winston’s pants buttons back on with sturdy thread. It was surely talking about the pants he wore on the day he ambushed Sally.

“What made you so excited that the button came undone?”


"Didn't you hear that there was a date with the Grand Princess that day?"


Crazy bastard. He spent the whole evening with the woman he is engaged to, and as soon as he came back, he tried to assault the maid.



"Since you are tall and have big hands, I suppose that area must be large too?"


One maid whispered, and another maid shook her arm, clenching her fist.


"It's obvious just by looking at the stretched thread. Isn't it around this size? Somehow, I feel like it must look exceptionally good there too, right?"

At that moment, Sally, unaware of it, thought of a large 'cigar' and wrinkled her face as if she had bitten into a bug.


I just couldn't understand why they were so curious about that bastard's filthy parts. Sally didn't want to know, but now it felt unfair that she could no longer avoid it.

The cart was almost empty. All that was left were trivial items like socks or handkerchiefs. As Sally carelessly picked up a neatly folded, freshly ironed white silk handkerchief from the basket, she frowned again.


"Isn't that the damn handkerchief?"
Leon stared at the women dancing with their chests exposed with indifferent eyes. Why were they so enthusiastic about mere flesh? It was no different from a piece of meat hanging in a butcher shop.

Among the five officers sitting at the table, the only one who looked bored with this seating was Leon.


Unable to bear the boredom, I cast a light glance at Colonel Humphrey sitting next to me. The superior was unaware that the city was turning into a pile of ashes and was licking his lips at the sight of the young girls.

The colonel had a serious expression like a Doberman on the outside, but the moment he left that place, he started laughing like a monkey. As if that wasn't enough, he led the intelligence officers to a cabaret, suggesting they throw a farewell party for the commander, who would soon return to civilian life.


A party without the guest of honor.


What was interesting to Leon was that contradiction, just that one.


Leaning my chin to the side, as I slowly swirled the glass that revealed the floor, the lieutenant colonel tilted the whiskey bottle over Leon's glass.

"Is it not fun?"


"My tastes are just particular."


The colonel chuckled softly at Leon's candid response.


"Hey, what about that woman over there?"


The colonel pointed to the dancer standing in the center of the stage as the poem concluded. With a dazzling smile, the beauty sent a kiss to the audience; she was the most popular woman in Winsford’s pleasure district. This also meant that the price for a night with her was the highest.


"Kitty Hayes. She's a woman no one can have."


A middle-aged man leaned his arm on Leon's shoulder and whispered as if giving him valuable information.


"You are lucky today. The owner of this cabaret owes me a debt."


They used to say to be cautious of women. Leon twisted the corners of his mouth as he took a gulp of whiskey.


"Thank you, but I'm not inclined to. I will decline."


"Hey, if you roll around in the dirt one more time, your obsessive-compulsive disorder will be completely cured. Everyone starts like that. Right, Johnson?"

She sells forced smiles to men, just like the prostitutes on stage, but has no intention of seducing them at all… No, she’s a novice who doesn’t even know how to seduce.

Not even a hint of perfume, just a country bumpkin fresh from the countryside.


Like Sally Bristol.


Even the eyes that are tired of the revelry happening in front resemble Sally's eyes looking at him.


Leon approached the woman standing blankly against the wall. Noticing his presence, the woman widened her deep blue eyes and looked up at him.

"Um, what do you need?"


I could not understand the reason for his stuttering. Was he frightened, or did I sense an impure aura from him?


Leon picked up any candy box from the tray and put it in the pocket of his officer's uniform, then handed over a bill.

When the woman tried to give him change, he shook his head and asked.


"Is this your first time?"


"Yes?"


The woman opened her eyes wide again.


"Why... do you ask something like that?"


Seeing him act like a scared little mouse made it seem like he misinterpreted the question of whether it was his first time.



"Is this the first time for you today?"


It seemed that she was indeed misunderstood, as the woman's face turned bright red. She dropped her gaze and awkwardly smiled as she asked back.

"How did you know?"


"That's tea."


With her arms crossed, she silently looked down, and the woman again acted like a frightened little mouse, glancing at him sideways.




"Well... is there anything else you need?"
The woman, frozen in place and only watching for signs, took off her old trench coat only after Leon tapped his wristwatch. The look in Leon's eyes as he watched the woman slowly undo the ribbon and buttons of her cabaret uniform was no different from when he had gazed at the naked dancers on stage.


"Take all of it off. Ah, leave the stockings."


The woman got onto the bed wearing nothing but cheap rayon stockings, having taken off her bra and bloomers, but the man did not approach.

The woman, who was glancing at him while wrapping her naked body with her hands, had no way of knowing that in the mind of that young officer, who looked like a movie star, another woman was undressing right now.

Is it because it doesn’t smell like blood?


Leon stared at the woman sitting on the bed, exposing her flesh like a hunk of meat, with an expressionless gaze before reaching out to the small table.

"Wow!"


The moment the sharp tip of the wine opener mercilessly dug into Leon's thumb, the woman let out an annoying sound. Yet, Leon, from whose thumb blood began to flow, did not even furrow his brow.

He approached the bed, licking the blood that was trying to flow down his wrist with his tongue. The woman backed away into the corner of the bed, her eyes wide with fear.

Leon firmly gripped the jaw of the woman trying to escape from him and crushed his thumb against her trembling pale lips. The woman's lips were stained entirely red with his blood.

This might work.


His taste may not be that maid. He might be able to get excited solely from the smell of blood and the contempt nestled in a woman's eyes.



"Yes, go ahead and despise me. You've been doing very well until now."


Leon, who had given a confident smile to the woman glaring at him as if she were looking at a monster, lowered his head. The smell of blood-filled lips came closer in an instant.

The smell of blood.


And the woman who despises me.



It will be understood.
"Our bathtub is available for use anytime. We're like family, after all."


Jimmy's house had a bathtub with hot water facilities. It was quite an enticing offer, but I had never used it even once. There was a hint of a mischievous scheme in Jimmy's smile.

"There's no chance before the wedding night."


Sally submerged herself up to her chin and let out a pleasurable moan. It felt as if her tense muscles were slowly loosening.



"Let's enjoy a little more before we go out."


As I closed my eyes and entered the hot water in the dim bathroom, drowsiness soon washed over me. Without realizing it, I nodded off and buried my nose in the bubbles. Startled, I lifted my head and blew at the bubbles, causing small soap bubbles to rise and float.



"I think I should wash up before the water cools down."


I hesitated for a moment as I reached for the sponge on the golden tray hanging at the edge of the bathtub. That is the object Winston rubbed on my naked body.

"Ugh!"


Without realizing it, I imagined that sponge rubbing against the cigar. Sally let out a gasp and plunged her head deep into the bubbles.



Please wash away all the dirty memories in my mind, too.


"Pooh...."


As soon as she could no longer hold her breath, she lifted her head out of the water. Sally, panting as she brushed away the water and foam flowing down her face with her hand, froze the moment she opened her closed eyes.

“Who is this? Lady Sally Bristol, who is more haughty than Princess Eldrich and more expensive than Kitty Hayes, in my bathtub, no less, and completely naked.”

Winston was leaning sideways against the door opposite the bathtub, laughing. He was unbuttoning the buttons of his officer's jacket one by one.

“Damn it. This is ridiculous. When did that guy come in?”


He was not curious about "how." Winston had the master key to the annex. In other words, it meant that there were no locked doors in this annex for him.

"Captain, please. I'm really sorry."


As he pleaded, he chuckled softly and draped the stockings over his jacket. Sally hugged her knees and curled up even tighter.



Even though I was in hot water, my hands and feet felt cold and frozen. It was due to a sense of helplessness.


It's the worst situation. I couldn't run away because I was naked. Moreover, grappling while being naked is fatal. I have to fight while exposing all my vulnerable spots.

I felt like a fish in Winston's tank. After all, I had jumped into the tank myself, so how foolish was that? He would quickly take Sally out and greedily devour her.

“Captain, please just look the other way this once. I won't use the bathroom again.”


"Sseu."


Winston smiled only with his lips as he replied. His eyes were like a lion with its prey right in front of him.


"Instead, can you tell me in advance? Be here early."


He unbuttoned his shirt until the prominent curve of his chest was briefly visible and took out the cuffs of his sleeves. As he slowly rolled his sleeves up to just below his elbows, his smooth forearms were revealed. The sharply defined muscles cast a dense shadow vertically.



The muscles must not only be firmly attached there. As I looked at the exposed body, the fear that I might soon have to fight a sturdy man barehanded became even more palpable.

Sally recalled all the various self-defense techniques she had learned and practiced over time.


Let's avoid the worst-case scenario. But which is worse, being forced to mix with the author or being too good at self-defense and getting caught as a spy?

"I can specially wash you. It's the least I can do for Bristol, who works hard for me."


You must be struggling not for you, but because of you.


Sally bit her lip with a sad expression.


It was gradually heading towards the worst. Usually, Winston would take things lightly and make sarcastic remarks if something bothered him. But now, his light-hearted actions and words were by no means sarcasm.

He was genuinely enjoying it like a child who received a Christmas present eight months early. It meant that heartfelt apologies were futile.

"My underwear!"


Sally, still curled up, peered down at the rug.


"Goddamn perverted kid."


Winston was pressing the other hand against Sally's bloomers, which she had taken off and placed on the rug. The front of the pants seemed not to be intended to be fastened.

"Ah!"


A finger that had been resting on the edge of the bathtub suddenly poked Sally's cheek.


"Did you apply the medicine I gave you?"


Sally stepped back against the wall and asked in a wary voice.


“Captain, have you been drinking?”


Once again, the smell of strong liquor wafted from him as he let out a slight laugh.


“Don't worry. I'll be fine enough not to do anything I'll regret when I wake up tomorrow morning.”


Winston leaned on the edge of the bathtub with his elbows and propped his chin on his prominently jutting knuckles. As a result, his face came much closer.

It felt like I could reach out my hand at any moment and snatch the body away. Even blinking my eyes became unsettling.



"What's wrong? I'm just trying to have a conversation. We haven't seen each other for a few days, right?"


Do you think you're a lover who can't live without seeing each other even for a day? I thought I could live without seeing you.



As we talked while leaving a naked woman helplessly trapped in the bathtub, it was a transparent lie.


“If you need a report, nothing happened during the days you were away.”


Even though I tried to suppress my true feelings, a cold breeze blew through my voice. I must not show any hostility towards him. I should always pretend to be a meek and obedient maid, yet this person relentlessly tested Sally's patience.

nothing to do with me?


Jimmy thinks that Winston sees her as a woman, but Sally has a different opinion. To the author, she is just the handkerchief used for masturbation, nothing more than that.

Is it a guiding newspaper, then?


"You're thinking of calling the police because of that gun, right?"


"Does that mean you would do anything to find a fiancé?"


"No."


As soon as the words fell, the maid firmly refused, and Leon couldn't hold back his laughter. It seems he thinks that by threatening her, he can make her spread her legs when she has no intention of doing so.

"Engaged, you say? Are you really going to just stand by while I face punishment because of you?"


"I should be able to take care of myself."


Of course, this harsh remark couldn't possibly reflect Sally's true feelings. Jimmy is not just a lifelong comrade. No matter what danger he faces, she will not give up and will save him to the end.

So this was merely a way of avoiding an uncomfortable topic.


"Ah, that's right."


Is it through that? Winston chuckled to himself and extended his hand with the jacket. In his hand, which had emerged from rummaging through his clothes, was a small box. He took out a red candy from the box and held it out to Sally's lips.



"I've been living thinking of you."


I was so taken aback that without realizing it, Winston slipped a candy between my slightly parted lips. Sally reflexively rolled the lump that had come up on her tongue and frowned.

"I think I must be drunk…."


I bought candy while thinking of her; this was something that couples might say.


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.



"Piece."
He swallowed his saliva. The two knees rising in the middle of the foamy cream looked flushed pink, like appetizing peaches, perhaps because of the hot water.

Leon imagined drawing the submerged body by connecting numerous dots to complete a picture, as if revealing a sculpture emerging from the water.

The heavy stillness, as taut as a drawn bowstring, was broken by a whisper that was deeply locked away.


"I'm curious about what it tastes like."


Sally exhaled the breath she had been holding until now.


"Did I buy it without knowing the taste?"


I swallowed the saliva that had pooled in my mouth and, rolling the candy in the opposite cheek, replied.


"It's cherry flavored."


Winston released the hair he was holding between his fingers and picked up the candy box. I thought he might want to try one too, but he was not that simple of a person.

A box tilted over the bathtub and poured all the red candies into the water.


What on earth is this trickery?


Sally not only opened her eyes wide but also parted her lips like a fool.


"Oh no... I wanted to taste it too, but my hand slipped?"


How could it be that you confidently poured it out in front of me and then your hand slipped? You madman.


"I'm sorry, but we have to share, right?"


It was an attempt to kiss.


Winston's broad chest rose over Sally's body, casting a dark shadow. Not content with that, he used his large hands to touch the wall and the bathtub, trapping Sally between his arms.

Winston's face tilted slightly to the right. As his lips drew closer, the gap between the man's lips widened.


Sally pressed her body tightly against the wall, her legs shaking. Wrapping her arms around her knees, she tilted her head to the side just before his lips touched hers.

He sat on the rug and casually threw out a provocative remark.


"Yes?"


"Your nipple is pink."


The woman's face turned pale white and then immediately flushed red.


“…You’re jumping to conclusions without having seen it.”


The bubbles are so thick, it doesn't make any sense. Sally hugged her chest tighter and glared at Winston. As a result, his gaze was fixed on her upper chest, which stood out even more.

"Then shall we check if what I said is correct?"


The hand that was draped over the edge of the bathtub suddenly plunged deep into the water. Sally flinched and tried to avoid it, but the hand was reaching toward the opposite side.

퐁.


A sound of something being pulled from beneath the bubbles was heard. As the sound of water rushing out of the bathtub followed immediately, Sally was horrified.

In Winston's hand, which emerged from the water, there was the plug of the bathtub.


"Or will you admit it?"


When the water drains away, the body will be completely exposed.


"That's right! So please give it back."


He reached out a hand towards the cork, but Winston quickly pulled his hand back and gave a mischievous smile.


"What is right?"


Sleep had already settled deep in Sally's chest, leaving no time to delay.


“…That's right, it's pink.”


Sally mumbled through clenched teeth. Winston let out a sly smile at her biting her lips in humiliation and offered her the cork.

protruding from his smooth knuckles traced Sally's naked form, revealed above the water.


Unlike the violent words, the touch was gentle, as if caressing a lover. The gap was so disgusting it made me shudder.



“You'll flail your arms and struggle, but you won't be able to escape from me. Someone has thoughtlessly poured soap into the bathtub, making it slippery. If you break a finger, that would be a big problem. I guess I'll have to twist your arms behind your back to hold you. It's all for your sake. Don’t you know?”


“…….”


"I'm going to grab your lower abdomen. I'll pull your buttocks tightly towards me and thrust that thing I showed you a few days ago into the hole that you are squeezing tightly."

He no longer smiled. Sally met his serious gaze with a look of contempt. But Winston became even more agitated, exhaling harshly.



"Then you'll understand."


The back of the hand that slid along the side went down below the surface and caressed Sally's buttocks.


"Is your belly as hot as this water?"


Due to the knees being raised, a hand came through the gap that was formed. Just as he was about to touch the thigh, Sally kicked his hand away with her foot.

For some reason, he willingly let go. He closed his eyes, took a deep breath, and said in a deeply submerged voice, as he suppressed his cruel desires.

"However, I'm doing my best to hold back what I want to do. You're a good kid."


Sally suppressed the urge to burst into laughter. Is this what it means to endure? Should I look up the definition of "endure" in the dictionary and teach it again?

"Can I honestly speak as well?"


Winston still nodded with his eyes closed. Sally bit her dry lips firmly and uttered a statement that was not honest at all.



"I'm disappointed in you, Captain."


There’s no way I would be disappointed in him. I have no expectations. The moment one is disappointed in an adversary is only when the adversary fails to meet expectations and proves to be inadequate.


"I thought you were someone who wouldn't do terrible things like assault."
On the tips of his sleek and neat fingers, there hung the white bloomer that Sally had taken off.


"Is it going to be a fight?"


Winston dropped his heavily soiled underwear, full of semen, onto Sally's peach-colored knee. The bodily fluid, soaked with his hot body temperature, stuck to her skin in a sticky manner. She wanted to tear it off immediately due to disgust, but she could not. Sally could not take her eyes off the man who was slowly rising.


Contrary to the expectation that he would pounce, he straightened his clothes neatly and then walked toward the door.



"This is my intuition…."


The shirt was so tight that it seemed about to burst, and with a fierce gaze, he stared at his back, when Winston suddenly turned his body and looked down at Sally.

"I think you know the answer."


He is notorious for both his cruel methods of torture and his animalistic instincts. And that notoriety was not unfounded.



Sally knew the answer.


As she held her breath, Winston squinted his eyes at her.


"Then why aren't you wearing the stockings I bought for you?"


He roughly tore Sally's cheap stockings and stuffed them into the trash can, then walked out the door as if he had no further business. When the door slammed shut, Sally exhaled the breath she had been holding and tugged at her wet hair.



"I'd rather be fired right now."




* * *





'This is torture.'


Sally sighed as she dusted off the books on the shelf with a duster. Inflicting physical pain is not the only form of torture. The way Winston mentally tormented her every day was also a clear form of torture.


"I think you know the answer."
Winston buying the stockings was also part of the dismissal operation. It was already expected that he would make a move, but I couldn't tolerate him putting his fingers past the band of the stockings underneath the garter belt straps.



"What are you doing, Captain?"


"Body search for illegal possession of weapons."


"Did the captain not take that illegal weapon?"


"Really?"


"It's right there in the desk drawer."


"Do you know it well? Then why aren't you taking it?"


"You said it's a seizure."


“You're smart.”


It was a tone that was heavy with disappointment rather than praise. The hand, which had been searching everywhere on Sally's thigh for a nonexistent gun, soon fell away.

"Looks like that fiancé of yours didn't come to save you again, did he?"


"It seems that you are waiting for me to break the law again."


Since I was going to get cut anyway, I stopped pretending to be the obedient maid. A soft breath brushed against the nape of my neck.



"Sally, as someone who cares for you, I'll give you some advice. It's better not to marry a man of such poor quality."


It was unimaginable for Winston, who could be second to none in the kingdom for being so terrible, to say such a thing. There was no greater contradiction than this.

But it couldn't be said to be completely wrong. It's hard to call a man who wants to make my fiancée the mistress of his enemies a good man.

"Sally."


Once I leave here, I will never use the alias 'Sally' again. Because Winston would call me that constantly, just hearing the name Sally might have caused me to have a nervous breakdown from his sly voice echoing in my mind.

"My name is Holly Easter, and...."


Winston chuckled. Holly Easter. He immediately recognized that it was a pseudonym for wishing a happy Easter.


"What about the remittance?"


“To the post office on Main Street in Winsford….”


“Winsford?”


"Yes."


“The appearance and attire of the remitter.”


"All we have is the information that they have long brown hair, bright skin, and wore round sunglasses."


“Why is that all there is?”


The voice that asked was dangerously low.


"I'm sorry, Captain. I interrogated the employee who was responsible for the remittance, but there was no significant gain. It wasn't easy to jog their memory. They said it was chaotic right before the closure, and because they were dressed plainly, there wasn't anything memorable."


Sally turned her back and smiled with satisfaction. Once again, she was a step ahead.


"A young woman in her early to mid-20s."


"Yes, that's correct."


"Little Lee is here."


Winston leaned back deeply in his chair and let out a smirk.


"It is nothing short of audacious. How dare that rat come and go as if my land is his own?"


Sally struggled to hold back a smile at the resentful tone. There was nothing as exhilarating as stirring up the enemy's stronghold and skillfully slipping out of their encirclement.


"Do you know? I am extremely bold, but you are utterly pathetic."
watched the woman pouring sparkling water into the clean cup that was upside down on the desk.


Brown hair. A few days ago in Winsford.


The maid tilted her head as if she felt his gaze and extended a cup. At that moment, his eyes dulled.


Absurd speculation.


This woman was not smart enough to do such things. She is a woman who plays in his hands every day.


As the situation began to gradually become bothersome to her eyes, she had already called the maid to inquire about Sally's circumstances, but there were no suspicious points at all.

Moreover, he did not resemble the known member of Riddle in appearance or clothing at all. They all had blonde hair and brown or hazel eyes. That rat's hair was clearly disguised by dye.

"Good job. Go ahead."


As Campbell left, Leon extinguished the cigar, which was more than half smoked, by pressing it into the ashtray and stood up. When he approached the sofa, the maid, who was arranging the cushion in the corner, turned around.

"Ah, Captain!"


He sat on the sofa and wrapped his arms around the maid's waist. As he sat her on his lap and leaned back as if holding a baby, the woman pushed against his chest.

"Just stay still. We're not doing it here."


Then it means you will do it somewhere else.


Sally grimaced, showing her displeasure, but Winston didn't even smirk. A hand came from under the white frilled headband and ruffled her hair. Her neatly braided hair was unexpectedly disheveled by Winston, which made her irritation soar.



"What are you doing right now...?"


"Brown."


"Yes?"


"It's real."



Surely you didn't check because of the remitter's appearance just moments ago, did you?
"A few months ago, I felt a strange feeling whenever I saw you, but lately it's gotten worse. You're hovering around me so much that I can't concentrate on my work."

“Then I will live in hiding like a nonexistent person. Or you can just fire me….”


"There's no need for that."


“What is it that you want?”


"Your body."


Such blatant and rude remarks no longer surprised her. Sally responded without raising an eyebrow.


"It seems like there's a contradiction."


"Let's just give it a try and then clean up afterward. Once we get all messy, it will probably be more boring than we think. If I no longer find you interesting, it will be easier for you too."

"I don't like that."


"Why? Do you want to be the government?"


"No."


Before he could finish his words, a firm rejection came down, and Leon couldn't help but suppress a disheartened smile.



"Yeah, I don't plan on having such annoying pets either. Plus, just to make sure you don't get the wrong idea, I don't like you. I'm only doing this because I can't help it without you. Do you have any idea how bothersome that is?"

"I understand that well, but I don't like such disgusting things."


"How can you know if you haven't even tried? It might actually be good once you give it a go."


"Then isn't it more difficult? You tried it once and found it boring, but what if I want to do it more?"


It would never happen, but if it seemed like it would connect, I had to say something, no matter what.


"And how can you believe me? If I were to suddenly have an illegitimate child, it would put you in a difficult position as well, Captain."

As the car came along the path through the garden, they were pressed closely against the window to catch the attention of the employees, but unfortunately, no one noticed them.

Sally fixed her gaze on the doorman, her last hope. The middle-aged man raised his eyebrows at her sitting in the passenger seat, but soon turned his eyes away.

Her shoulders drooped down. The doorkeeper is not a talkative person. So, Winston would not spread rumors about the maid going somewhere.

"You worked hard."


"Yes?"


The maid quickly turned her head to look at him. Leon twisted his lips into a smile instead of answering.


A gaudy light pink blouse with frills, a brown checkered skirt, and a red cardigan that was shamefully pilled. It looked even more unattractive than when standing in front of Winsford department store. She was deliberately trying to make the date dull.



"Then take off your stockings."


The thin black silk thread made the woman's healthy skin shine through, which was quite a sight. Moreover, that tacky blouse didn't constrict the neck like a maid's uniform. The exposed collarbone and the hollow groove beyond it kept drawing the eye.



As I kept my eyes forward, my attention naturally drifted to the edges of my vision, and I couldn’t help but recall the sight of that woman curled up naked in the dim bathroom last night. It was only natural that a bothersome reaction arose between my legs.



"So what’s the answer?"


"What?"


"You should know the answer."


It was to ask why he only gets aroused by Sally.


"I don't understand what you mean."


Sally firmly glanced at Winston's hand on the steering wheel, pretending to be indifferent. It had been over a year since she had seen him drive himself, and today, she couldn't understand what had brought on this whim.


"Unlucky."
"Wouldn't it be better to leave the driving to a professional?"


When I mocked him, he responded with something unrelated instead of answering.


"Is that guy your fiancé?"


"Yes?"


Sally scrunched her face, clearly showing her sincere displeasure. Winston merely turned his gaze this way and crookedly lifted the corners of his mouth.

"I like that handsome man."


"Probably not?"


"Why is it that Captain decides that?"


"You don't like me, do you?"


I'm speechless.


Sally stared at Winston's face with a cold gaze.


Skin tanned just enough to look good. Sleek eyes elegantly framed by long eyelashes. A smoothly dropping nose. A strong jawline.



Damn it.


He is a devil who inspires nothing but contempt, but even Sally had to admit that he was handsome. With such a wonderful exterior, why is the inside so grotesquely twisted?

"Ah, that's right."


"What's wrong?"


"I can see by looking at you, Captain. I like handsome and kind men."


When I thought he could smile again, he just furrowed his brow and stared straight ahead. Could it be that he was upset by the idea that he wasn't kind? The nickname Vampire didn't come about for no reason; he doesn't even know his own place.




"A handsome and kind man..."
"What are you looking at? This is just a uniform."


When I glared at him, the attendant averted his gaze and gave Winston an exaggerated smile, like one you would see on an advertisement poster.

"Where shall I guide you?"


"Restaurant."


As the command was given, the attendant guided the two people to the elevator. Passengers and staff passing by all cast curious glances at Sally.

I wasn't used to being in the spotlight, so I felt a bit awkward, but it was a good thing. As long as the gaze of others kept following him, Winston wouldn’t be able to act foolishly.

As the elevator door opened, Winston gestured for her to enter first, as if she were a lady. It was not very gentlemanly of him to push with his hand on his lower back.

"Good night."


The elevator operator slightly lifted his hat in greeting. Sally exchanged a nod and stood at the corner. Winston came in behind and stood in the middle, digging through his jacket's inside pocket.

He took out two crisp bills and handed them to the driver. The driver’s eyes widened, and when Winston winked with one eye, he nodded slightly and accepted the money.

"Do you give a tip to the elevator operator every time you get on the elevator?"


Sally frowned at a luxury that she could never even think of, but Winston forcibly pulled her to stand in the middle of the elevator. As he got very close to Sally, she stepped aside, but he pulled her back again. When she shot him a sidelong glance, Winston leaned against the wall and laughed.


I soon found out what all this unexpected behavior was actually for. The elevator, which had been smoothly ascending after the door closed, suddenly stopped and jolted loudly.

"Ah!"


He had his arms crossed tightly, and since he was in the middle of the elevator, he couldn't lean against the wall.

Just as his body wavered and he collapsed against Winston's chest, a thick arm wrapped around his shoulder.


"Try some training in patience, Bristol. Are you planning to attack me in front of people?"


"Please fall."



I tried to shake off the clingy one by jabbing my elbow into the solar plexus. As I bent down with a grunt, I thought it
Sally, who had been quietly watching Winston order from the waiter, suddenly interrupted.


“No, I've changed my mind. I'll have the porterhouse steak instead.”


The waiter looked at Sally with a surprised expression. Winston also had a look of surprise.


The porterhouse steak, featuring a T-shaped bone in the middle, was a dish that was so large that it was rarely ordered by those who were not big eaters. It was almost a symbol of gluttony, so women were unlikely to order such a dish while being conscious of others' eyes.



Sally tilted her head and smiled brightly. She intended to make the desire for sex cool down, even if it meant embarrassing others in front of her.

In front of her, he is a lustful son of a bitch, but at least in front of others, he is the embodiment of manners and dignity, Winston. Does he have to spend four hours immobile with a woman who knows neither manners nor dignity in front of others? It was calculated that he would get fed up and drop out immediately.


Winston narrowed his eyes at Sally and chuckled softly as he corrected the order.


"Then for the lady, a porterhouse steak."


As the waiter left, Sally began to pull at the lint of her cardigan. Winston, who had been silently watching the scene, scoffed again.



"Bristol sheep."


"Yes?"


“If I called you a lady, you should behave like one.”


"What does it mean to behave like a lady?"


There are times when it is necessary to infiltrate the upper class, so I have trained in the etiquette and demeanor specific to them, but Sally pretended not to know and feigned ignorance.

“The lady does not eat porterhouse steak.”


"Is that so? That's too much."


"And shouldn't you usually apologize before interrupting?"



"Is that so? I'm sorry."
The woman devoured a steak the size of my face without leaving a single piece.


Isn't it polite to savor a meal slowly while engaging in conversation?


But the woman finished the meat at a terrifying speed without saying a single word. When I pointed out the sunset outside the window with my chin, she simply replied, "Yes, that's the time." That was all.

Leon's calf dish, which he ordered while watching that ridiculous scene, had completely cooled down. When only a large T remained on Sally's plate, he gathered the knife and fork next to the dish he had barely touched.

“…You really ate all of that.”


I moved to a café. The woman who was seriously reading the menu responded nonchalantly.


"Did you think you wouldn't be able to eat?"


The drinks are at the back, but the woman was flipping through the menu at the front where the cakes were.


"Do you want to eat some cake too?"


The woman demanded that he order two types of cake she wanted from Leon instead of answering. He stared at the woman, who only cast her gaze out the dark window, while he ordered the cake and coffee with a dazed feeling.

This date was unfolding completely differently than he had anticipated. He had naturally taken the lead in any group since he was young. Everything was under his control.

Today, I surely expected it to be so, but I felt a strange sensation as if I were being led by that cunning fox.


As the cake was served, the woman silently continued to eat. Curious to see how much could fit into that small body, Leon ordered another cake and asked.

"Don't you sometimes go to Madame Benoit’s café?"


The woman then stopped her fork and looked up at him.


"Yes."


In the short silence before answering, Leon sensed it. He was confused by the fact that he had been watching me for quite a while.




"She eats anything well."
Leon furrowed his brow and reached into his jacket. Taking out a cigar case, he opened it roughly and spat out the words.



"Is it an insult to satisfy a lady?"


"You want to call another boat."


This woman, increasingly...


Leon chuckled and closed the cigar case, putting it back into his jacket.


She is a woman who, after witnessing horrific torture and its aftermath, smiles brightly and asks, "When shall we do the cleaning?" I already knew she had a bold character.

However, now they boldly even utter lewd words.


"You always play coy like this, and when a man gets caught, do you treat the poor soul who fell for you like a seducer?"



"I have never tried to fish, so the unfortunate one is me."


She said she never intended to fish, but after finishing the cake, the woman immediately moved to another seat. It seems she decided to drink the most expensive champagne this time.

Isn't getting drunk a method typically used by women with strong pride to seduce a man and lure him to bed? I decided to generously go along with it just this once and ordered a bottle after the third glass, but the woman showed no signs of getting drunk.



"Aren't you dizzy? How about lying down and resting?"


At the suggestion to go to the room, the woman silently tilted her champagne glass. The brightly lit dock was getting closer outside the window behind the woman's head, as if it were broad daylight.

Has time already passed like this?


Leon sighed and rubbed his temples.


"Sally, you said you'd make it boring?"


"Yes. You only watched what I ate for four hours."



The woman, with a look of pity, scrunched her nose and added spitefully.
To get to the annex, there was no choice but to pass by the main building. As the car approached close enough to clearly see the main entrance of the building, Sally silently cheered.

A luxury sedan was parked on the stone path between the main gate and the fountain. And beside it, Mrs. Winston was seeing off Princess Aldrich.

To encounter two people who would be more vigilant than anyone else about a woman clinging to Winston. The completion of the operation was just around the corner.

As the headlights and engine sounds grew closer, both women turned their heads this way. Sally briefly met their gaze, then slightly lowered her head like someone guilty and glanced at Winston. She also made a troubled expression as if to say, "What should we do now that we've been caught?"


“Ah, the Grand Princess was supposed to come today. I forgot.”


Winston let out a short sigh and parked my car behind the Grand Duchess's car. Sally, who thought he would turn the car around, watched Winston exit the car with astonished eyes.

I made eye contact with Mrs. Winston. The shock was thickly etched on her face. Her glaring gaze also contained anger.



The Crown Princess did not once turn her eyes this way after they first met. A bashful smile faintly appeared on her calm face.



'This should be enough.'


Sally, feeling sorry for the innocent princess who was in trouble, quietly opened the car door and stepped out.

Without making a sound, she tried to sneak around the car and escape to the annex.


"Wow, what are you doing right now?"


"Come in."


Winston, who was greeting the two women, chased after and caught up with them. He casually spoke to her mother and fiancé while pushing Sally back into the car. As if that wasn’t enough, he leaned against the passenger door, trapping her inside.



Winston had personally carried out Sally's plan, and excessively so.


He returned to the driver's seat only after the Grand Princess's car had left. Although Mrs. Winston raised her voice in anger, he responded nonchalantly and drove straight to the annex.

Sally shot a glance at Winston with eyes full of disdain.


I want to see into the head of this person. I wonder what the brain looks like. To be so bold even after being caught cheating.

It was because he had spread her knees wide apart and forced his lower body between them.


Sally calmed her pounding heart and gazed at the robust man in front of her.


Today, it's okay to fight.


Since Mrs. Winston will chase her away soon anyway, there’s no need to hold back for fear of ruining the mission.

She just needs to fight in a way that doesn’t show her professional combat training, appearing somewhat careless.

As long as she doesn’t kill, that’s all that matters.


While Sally mentally rehearsed his weak points and prepared to fight, Winston had only one thought in mind: to strike her in her weak spot.



"As you can see, you have completely failed."


As he unbuckled the belt of his officer's jacket and took it off, it became clear what he wanted to show. The front of his trousers, which had been hidden at the end of the jacket, was bulging as if it would burst, with one button's thread coming undone.



Winston neatly folded his jacket in half and hung it evenly over the pool table before starting to roll up his sleeves. It was no different from the preparatory movements he always made whenever he personally took part in the torture.



"Since your way has failed, I guess I need to try my way now."


Meanwhile, Sally glanced at the holster resting on the jacket and estimated the distance. It should be safe to shoot at shoulder level. Then Winston won’t be able to touch her again until she manages to escape.

He rolled up the other sleeve and muttered as if he were scolding Sally for her mistake.


“Even if I cry today, you won’t let me go.”


Winston bent over towards Sally and placed his hands on either side.


Between their slightly parted lips, the farm that was spat out mixed with their breaths. Both of them flinched like people burned by a fire, but the meaning was different for each of them.

In a precarious distance where our noses almost touched, Winston softly spoke as if he were whispering.


"Today, you have only two choices."


Sally swallowed hard as she gazed intently into his eerily hot eyes. Winston also swallowed hard, his throat bobbing as he whispered in a deep voice.


"First. Have a relationship with me willingly and walk out of here in good condition."
His eyes pointed between the woman's legs.


"I won't promise elsewhere."


The woman looked at him with a rather serious gaze, as if she were making a big resolution, and then removed her hand that was covering her lips.

Leon, who had been biting his thick lips all evening due to his bizarre desires, froze the moment the woman did something he never anticipated.

The woman's left hand embraced his cheek. Her milky-white eyelids slowly descended, covering half of her turquoise eyes, and her slightly pale light pink lips approached Leon.

At that moment, the ringing in his ears thudded as if a bomb had exploded at close range.


Leon was wrapped in excitement as he watched the woman kiss me. At that moment when her soft flesh touched the tips of his lips, which had become dry and rough, a thrilling sensation he had buried in his memories pierced through his entire body.



Finally, the woman's lips were perfectly pressed together. Leon's chest was visibly rising and falling, and his breathing became rough.



The skin that touched was warm. Perhaps because I had eaten a lot of sweet things all night, it was even sweet to the touch.



The woman's lips slowly parted his lips and gently squished his flesh. Then, as they opened a little more, they kissed Leon's lips and fell away with a smacking sound.

The sound of lips colliding was similar to the sound of a slap on the cheek. In fact, it was much more discreet and a little more sensual.



The woman pressed her lips back together after they had fallen apart. I want to immediately embrace her tightly, greedily swallow her lips, and suck and nibble on them. Leon suppressed the impulse with the little reason he had left. Until now, he had only thought about forcibly taking advantage of her, but it was surprisingly exciting that the woman was being so proactive.



He also slowly moved his lips together.


Sometimes, I unknowingly closed my eyes and then opened them again. And then, without realizing it, I observed the woman's reaction.



The always sharp gaze was unsettled. Her heaving chest rose and fell as if she were short of breath. It wasn't just her anxieties; there was a sense of relief that wasn't bad.


Leon caressed the woman's nape and lower back gently, sending a small sigh into her mouth.
Another hand lifted the skirt and burrowed into her lower back. Just as she was about to pull down the bloomer, Sally curled up her body by raising her legs that were spread across Winston's thighs. With the sudden lift of her legs, she pressed her heel down hard onto Winston's solar plexus.


"Ugh...."


He frowned and leaned forward. Sally took the moment when his grip on her wrist loosened and flipped her body.


I quickly crawled across the pool table towards the other side when my ankle was suddenly grabbed. Winston muttered curses as he clenched and pulled on Sally's ankle as if he were going to twist it off.

Unable to withstand the immense strength of the army officer, she grabbed a billiard ball that was rolling on the table. As he pulled Sally's hips towards his groin, Sally, who had been pretending to be dragged along submissively, suddenly turned and hit Winston's head with the billiard ball.


"Ugh!"


A hard ball hit him on the forehead and passed by. He squeezed his eyes shut from the sudden impact and staggered, yet he still gripped Sally's arm tightly.

"Ah!"


The arm, bent harshly behind him, felt like it was about to slip out of his shoulder. As he pressed down hard on his wrist with his thumb, his hand involuntarily opened, and the billiard ball dropped onto the pool table with a thud.

"Ha…."


A short gasp, mixed with frustration and anger, escaped from Winston. Sally let out a rough breath and turned her head back over her shoulder.

The disheveled platinum hair was deeply stained with blood. Winston then wiped the blood that started to flow down his forehead with his hand and gazed silently. The focus in his eyes gradually blurred.

"Sally...."


There was excitement boiling over in a dangerously low voice.


"You're too dangerous for me. You know exactly what I like."


He suddenly rubbed his blood-soaked fingers on Sally's lips.



“Gasp!”

As the sharp needle pierced his scalp, Leon squinted one eye. The spot where he had been hit by a billiard ball from the maid was torn. He tried to wipe away just the blood, but his mother made a fuss and called a doctor at past midnight.



It seems that the person who needs a doctor is not him.


Mother, sitting across from Leon at the coffee table, slouched in the armchair like a corpse. It was a comical sight, her head resting on an ice pack while being attended to by three maids.

"That's enough. Let's go."


When Leon sent off the doctor who was annoyingly talking about the risks of concussion and the possibility of fractures, his mother also sent away the servants. Seeing her glare directly at him, it seemed she was about to have a fit of hysteria.



"Oh my... God..."


As expected, my mother became hysterical, seeking help from the gods.


"Leon, are you out of your mind?"


Leon sat with his legs crossed, lightly tapping his fingers on his knee.


"You've been behaving so quietly until now, right? So why are you doing this just before the engagement? Are you trying to drive me to a nervous breakdown?"

A woman who is self-centered in everything. She insisted that her adult son’s pursuit of women was an act of rebellion to gain his mother’s attention and affection.

Unfortunately, Leon did not have enough affection for my mother.


As the poison oozed from her son's lips, Elizabeth picked up the ice pack that had been resting on the table and placed it on her forehead.



"Make sure to laugh like that at my funeral too."


"You don't have to worry about the engagement."


"How can you say there's nothing to worry about when the Grand Duchess saw you with another woman!"


"It's not love or anything like that; it's a transaction, isn't it? No matter what I do with other women, whether they are a grand princess or a grand duke, there's nothing to lose."

It was as if the woman was deftly manipulating his thoughts and controlling his body with a cunning trick.


From the day I first recognized the color of a woman's eyes, it intensified even more. It felt like a gradually sinking ship suddenly splitting in two and plummeting into the depths of the sea. Having been unaware of the ship sinking, he had no choice but to flail helplessly in the sea of impulses, completely unprepared in his heart.


Looking back on it myself, he was insane over the past month.


I was often so consumed by lust that I forgot my duties. Even today was like that. I had clearly remembered that the grand duchess would be coming in the evening, yet the moment the maid suggested a date, I completely forgot. For someone like me, who rarely forgets anything, it was nothing short of shocking.


Furthermore, for the past month, I had forgotten the dignity of being a noble and had acted like a hoodlum in alleys, flirting with women. I had promised myself to endure because I was a good child, yet the moment I encountered them, I lost my reason. The fact that I lost control over my body and reason was deeply unsettling.


"That maid, I need to get rid of her immediately."


Elizabeth stared at her son with a face that showed no concessions. It was because she expected Leon to oppose her.



But he crossed his arms and fell into deep thought, murmuring indistinct sounds.


"If it bothers you, you should remove it."


"What did you say?"


Leon stood up and headed towards the door, leaving his bewildered mother behind.


"Leon!"


"You said to cut it right now."


"What?"


Are you really trying to fire a woman with whom I had such a deep connection in an instant? Elizabeth was left speechless by the unexpected action.

Although he was my son born from my belly, sometimes his cold-blooded demeanor was chilling. She stared at the door through which her son had disappeared with a look of disgust.


Sally wandered restlessly in the maid's room.
As Sally opened the door, the moment her eyes met Winston's through the narrow gap, she slammed the door shut with a bang. Pushing against it with her shoulder to prevent it from being forced open, she locked it with a key from the inside and bolted it, just as he called out to her.


"Sally."


“Is it that Mrs. Winston has come to do something that would make her faint again?”


A hollow laugh flowed in from outside.


"That's not it. Yes, this is rather better."


Then Winston made an unexpected suggestion.


"I will look for a better job for you. It will be better for you too. With my signed recommendation letter, you will easily get in anywhere. Someone else will be found by Mrs. Belmore soon, so you just need to hold on until then. That's all for now."



Winston spoke his piece in an instant, like a student reciting a poem they memorized carefully, fearing that they might forget it if they took a breath.

I didn't expect him to say to leave. Sally stood there in a daze, completely taken aback. The hand that had been gripping her tightly suddenly relaxed, leaving her feeling unsteady.

"Ha, crazy person."


It’s bizarre, but everything has gone according to plan. Sally shook off an inexplicable discomfort and buried her exhausted body in bed.





* * *





Campbell sat at his desk, occasionally glancing sideways at his superior by the window. It had already been a week. Captain Winston was working not at the annex’s office, but at the Domestic Intelligence Department of the Western Headquarters.



Originally, it was normal to work from the office rather than from the residence, but for Captain Winston, that was abnormal. Management had been turning a blind eye to his working methods that could be considered a security breach due to his position and performance.



But why is it suddenly office work these days? Could it be related to the fact that the annex maid is leaving soon?


Campbell laughed self-deprecatingly at the absurdity of the situation. Isn’t it unreasonable for someone who has nothing to fear to be scared of a maid who is less than half their size?

It has already been over a year. I haven't returned to my hometown since Winston infiltrated me.


Sally, pushing the vacuum cleaner towards the entrance of the annex, let out a sigh. The tip of a black shoe came into view at the edge of her line of sight as she looked down at the floor. She had just barely finished cleaning the carpet, and now it was about to get dirty again from the shoe.


“Hey. Go back out again….”


Sally, who was about to scold him for shaking off his feet on the mat at the entrance, stiffened her face the moment she looked up. Winston walked in, accompanied by Campbell and several soldiers from the annex.

"Hello."


Sally pressed her body against the wall of the hallway to avoid it and merely nodded her head. When Winston stopped in front of Sally, those who were following also came to a stop.

Fred's eyes met Sally's. He faintly smiled at her. The disappointment was clearly visible in his drooping eyebrows.


When I said I was withdrawing, Fred was very disappointed.


“I don’t know who to rely on anymore.”


"There's Peter and Nancy too. You'll be able to do it well."


Fred pouted and kicked the grass in the garden with the tip of his shoe, then asked.


“Are you going to marry the Commander in Chief when you go back?”


It was about Jimmy. Sally smiled ambiguously and shrugged her shoulders.


"I don't know either. It doesn't seem like the right time yet."


“If it hadn’t been for that filthy royal piglet, I could have worked here with you for a long time.”


The rumor that Winston attempted to assault the maid had already spread widely among the soldiers in the annex. Fred, who was sharpening his tools upon hearing the rumor, was unaware that Sally almost became a victim because of an order given by Jimmy.



"I will definitely get my revenge."



Sally placed her hand on the fist clenched so tightly that the veins bulged.
"Indeed. How did it come to this?"


When I mocked him in an exaggerated tone, Winston tilted one corner of his mouth upward. It was a bitter -looking smile, unlike his usual sneaky demeanor. Without any particular response, Winston turned his back and headed towards the office, and Sally glared at him for a moment before heading downstairs.



* * *





The atmosphere is unusual.


Fred sat upright on a chair in the hallway in front of the office, glancing around with his side eye. There was a soldier standing at each end of the hallway. It seemed as if they were only there to prevent him from escaping.

Two hours ago, Lieutenant Campbell called out three members of the unit, saying he had something for them to do, so I followed him here without thinking. In front of the annex, the lieutenant brought four more soldiers.

"I thought I had to move heavy furniture up until that time...."


However, Campbell took the two inside in front of the office, while the other two were placed in the hallway. The three, including Fred, were seated in a row on chairs set up in the hallway.

After Winston entered the office, he called them in one by one. And now only Fredman was left.


"Did I do something wrong? Could it be that my identity has been discovered? I haven't done anything."


Sweat gathered in the fist resting on my knee. Just as I was about to wipe my slick hands on my pants, the office door burst open.



The second corporal who had gone in came out. His face was as pale as could be. What on earth had happened inside?



"Private Fred Smith."


As I watched the back of the private leaving as if fleeing, Campbell stood at the door and called out to him.


"Yes, yes!"


Fred entered the office, struggling to control his rapid breathing and dragging his trembling legs.



However, the atmosphere inside the office was surprisingly cheerful, despite the tension. As lively jazz played on
"Private Smith."


"Yes."


“Relax.”


The voice was quite soft. When the far-off captain personally offered the cup, Fred leaned forward and politely accepted it.



"Thank you."


It would be rude to put the drink that was just given back down. But I was worried I might make a mistake while intoxicated.



Fred took a sip just enough to wet his lips and slowly set the glass down on the table. Winston, who had been watching him, pulled the cigar away from his mouth and exhaled a long stream of white smoke.

“Today, I have called you here because there is a mission I need to entrust to you secretly without informing the upper management. I have selected a suitable person to carry out this task, and you are one of the candidates.”

Fred was taken aback by the unexpected situation and just blinked. I thought Winston was displeased with me because of the incident in the torture room where I vomited last time.

"Wasn't it?"


This might have been a golden opportunity to infiltrate the Information Department as key personnel and make a contribution. Then, someday, I could earn the trust of Little Jimmy and possibly become a cadre in the revolutionary army.



Fred greeted with a smile and didn’t hide his joy.


"It is an honor."


Winston smiled with a twist of his eye as he tapped the ashes from the ashtray.


"The two novices in front of you have been eliminated. So the expectations for you are high."


"Don't disappoint the Captain."


As Campbell chimed in from the side, Fred shouted with a determined expression.



"Yes, if you entrust it to me, I will do anything."
"Yes, that's right."


"I also went there on a family trip when I was fifteen. Private Smith was born and raised there, so perhaps I might have crossed paths with him."

Fred only gave an awkward smile instead of an answer. How did a wealthy tycoon like Winston end up in a countryside without luxury hotels?

"Oh, now that you mention it, something really funny happened."


Winston turned his head towards Campbell and casually started chatting about memories from Fairhill.


"There was a pub below the ski resort."


Is the author really drunk?


Relaxing a bit, Fred picked up the glass of whiskey in front of me and wet his parched mouth.


"They serve warm mulled wine over there, and the owner thought I was an adult just by looking at my size. That day, Jerome and I drank so much that on our way out of the pub, I fell into the snow."

"Oh dear."


"If the bar customers hadn't found us, we would have frozen to death right there. It's a pleasant memory."


"It must be a terrible memory for Mrs. Winston."


As the two people burst into laughter, Fred followed suit and set down his glass. With the alcohol kicking in, his stiff body quickly relaxed.



"Fred, do you know Mr. Albert? That pudgy pub owner."


“Ah, yes, yes.”


I don't know. But it doesn't make sense to say I don't know. The moment Fred chimed in, Winston grinned at Campbell.



"He was an agreeable person."


"Yes, that's right. Haha...."



"Oh, and there was a festival that took place every winter... Ah! The Feast of Saint Maurice."
Fred couldn't hide his confusion at the sudden confession. Winston stared at his clearly shaken eyes and smiled chillingly.



"I may not have been there, but I know this. The feast day name is not Saint Maurice, but Saint Nicholas."


Winston suddenly stood up from his seat. Fred remained frozen in the same position, facing Winston. The fist clenched on his knee grew cold in an instant and began to tremble. The sound of chess being played behind him abruptly stopped.



"Oh, and it's rye bread, not gingerbread."


A fierce voice murmured after a sneer.


"How could I fall for such a trivial trap?"


I should have escaped from here, but my body wouldn't listen. All Fred could do was look at Winston by rolling his eyes while staring down at his trembling limbs. Winston was standing by the window, gazing outside.

"Fred Smith. Why did he write a false hometown on his enlistment application?"


Leon pulled back the thin lace curtain and muttered to himself as he followed something outside with his gaze.


"My conclusion is…."


He slowly closed and opened his eyes.


"You're really a terrible spy."


First, the two who were questioned were not spies. When I pressed them a bit, they quickly confessed to embezzling public funds and squandering it on entertainment expenses. It was truly a waste of time.

“Campbell.”


Campbell took out the yellow folder from under the sofa and opened it as soon as the instructions were given. Soon, against the backdrop of the ridiculous jazz melody flowing from the radio, a reading of Fred Smith's enlistment application was held.



"Name, Fred John Smith. Father, Robert John Smith. Occupation is a butcher."


"The son, raised under a father who runs a butcher shop, turns pale at the sight of blood and vomits. Campbell, does this make sense?"




"It is not possible."
Leon looked at the agent in front of him with a bitter expression.


This is an insult. How much did the rebel leadership underestimate him that they sent an untrained rookie to infiltrate under him?



If you're going to send someone, send a proper opponent.


It was humiliating to have been toyed with by such a low-level insult. The fact that I was infiltrated by that rookie is true.



But who could have imagined it? The Domestic Information Division and the Advisory Office. To send a timid and incompetent person as a spy to this key military facility.

I can't even remember my fake identity information. It was obvious that I was such an idiot who would have graduated at the very bottom from the rebels' 'brainwashing school.'

"Hey, do you know that?"


Leon gave the teachings that would soon become insufficient blood and flesh to the imbecile in front of him in easy-to-understand words.



"The so-called 'revolutionary government' has come to power, and since then, the unemployment rate has skyrocketed and the country has become even poorer."

Leon leaned his body diagonally against the chair and tapped the edge of the table with the edge of the nipper.


"You preach equality. Is the equality your kind envisioned just for everyone to be equally poor?"


He seemed not to hear his kind instructions. The pale gaze oscillated along the nipper.


"Revolution."


Leon gazed at him with a sneer on his lips.


"You are just a gang of thugs."


The guy who calls himself the revolutionary army is utterly pathetic.


The guy named 'Fred Smith' showed no signs of displeasure even as Leon insulted the revolutionaries.



"The driver."
He started to cry like a puppy alone, opening and closing his mouth as if he had something to say, and then began to beg for his life.



"Please, please save me."


"Well. I'm someone who doesn't know about mercy."


Despair overshadowed his face.


"However, you know well about deals."


Despair quickly yielded its place to hope.


Leon measured the creature in his mind, pleading with eyes that disgustingly glimmered as if it could do anything.


Is this guy a key figure of the rebels? I wonder if he knows where their base is. How much can he fill in the gaps in the intelligence on their leadership? It doesn't seem very likely, but there’s no harm in trying.

“So, Fred. Ah, is Fred really his real name?”


The guy nodded his head slightly. It was funny how, having come to bite him, the dog suddenly turned into a well-behaved one.



"The longer we take, the more valuable your life will become."


So it was a suggestion to not resist and to honestly reveal what was being asked.


"I want to settle some old grievances with Little Jimmy as men, you know. Where can I meet him?"


His eyes trembled slightly.


“…I don’t know, I don’t know.”


At that moment, Leon's indifferent expression changed.


I know the location of the base. What I thought was a small fry turned out to be a big fish with key information.


"I don't have much patience."


Leon tapped the desk again with the tip of the nippers. Since this was the tool that made him gag while watching the driver pull out the nails, it should be effective enough.

the guy flinched.


Leon roughly placed the pliers on the table as if throwing them and took off his officer's jacket. While Campbell immediately stood up to take the jacket and hung it on the wall, he untied the cuffs and neatly rolled up the sleeves.



The young one, who watched from the side, couldn't possibly be unaware that this was the act of personally torturing someone. The bastard, who sensed his own fate, shook his head and screamed.

"Please, please...."


"Well, then I will personally give you the training that your commander has not provided."


As I picked up the nippers that had been thrown on the table, he curled his fingers to hide his nails and struggled.


"Training that dulls the pain. When the day comes that you're pierced by dozens of bullets, you'll be grateful to me."


“Please! I didn't do anything!”


He still insisted stubbornly, babbling only nonsense with no nutritional value.


“Leaking information is someone else….”


Then suddenly she stopped speaking, lowered her head, and her shoulders heaved.


"Then who did it? The ghost of the annex?"


A short snicker escaped from Leon's twisted lips.


"Do you remember that driver you stole? I tied him to the chair you’re sitting in now and pulled out his fingernails one by one."



As soon as I imagined what would happen to me, the spy trembled in a pitiful way, completely drained of color.

When he started to gag, Leon frowned.


"Ugh, sob, sniff...."


"Do you remember? Right. That day you threw up in that corner. The maid had a tough time cleaning it up. I'm warning you, don't throw up this time. I don't want to have to clean up your mess until the last day."

He lightly tapped the nippers in one hand like a whip as he approached the guy, walking around the corner of the table. With each slow step he took, the guy squirmed and twisted in his chair.


A futile act.
Then tomorrow morning, I will wake up before the sun rises and go to the back gate of the mansion. I have decided to take a carriage that delivers milk to the mansion and head out to Hale Wood.

Then I take the tram to Winsford and catch a train. Just in case, I wasn't thinking of going straight home but rather plan to stop by 'Sally Bristol's' hometown for about a day.

"Can I think of it as a long-awaited vacation?"


It may be a rural village with nothing to see compared to here, but at least it will be more liberating than this place.


"After that, I should finally be able to meet Jimmy in 2 to 3 days."


Then I can finally get rid of the uncomfortable name Sally Bristol. Forever.


"Oops!"


Suddenly, the cart was pulled forward sharply. As a result, it fell over, and someone jumped out from behind the cart and quickly reached out their arm in front of Sally.

In an instant, my waist was wrapped around and I was trapped in the man's embrace. Even without looking up, I could tell who the owner of this sharp cigar fragrance was.

"Captain, please stop."


The more she struggled, the tighter Winston hugged Sally's waist as if to crush it. Somehow, it felt like he was letting her go too easily. Just as she bent her right leg back to kick his left shin, Winston released her.

"I really wonder where you received training because you fight so well."


She glared at him, who was smiling, and reached out for the cart. However, her hand couldn't touch the cart. As if he were her lover, Winston took Sally's hand and gestured with his chin to the soldiers standing behind the cart.

"Let me go."


As the soldiers pulled the cart, Sally twisted her hands. Winston, on the contrary, forced his fingers apart and interlocked them, acting playfully.

"We've already kissed, so a handhold should be fine, right?"


As Winston pulled out the moments she had been trying hard to erase from her mind, Sally hesitated.


“…It's a hand with a lot of work to do.”



“It's okay. You have somewhere to go with me.”
As Winston let out a light laugh, the soldiers awkwardly raised and then lowered the corners of their mouths. He placed a hand on Sally's shoulder, who was puffing her cheeks and glaring.

"I'll leave the door open. Is that okay?"


As if to admonish, he concluded with his words and entered alone. Only after Winston stood far from the desk, which was distant from the door, did Sally pull her foot away from the wall in the hallway.

Sally, who went inside, was astonished.


"What's with having a party in broad daylight?"


The inside was a mess. On the coffee table, there were scattered whiskey bottles and several crystal glasses. The ashtray that had been emptied in the morning was already piled high with ash.

Surely, this mess cannot be a gift.


"Where is the gift?"


I was only thinking of expressing my gratitude and leaving. Standing in the middle of the office, Winston pointed with his eyes to a flat, wide box placed on the desk. The box was tied with a black ribbon.

"You don't need stockings anymore."


"Stockings, you say."


Winston crossed his arms and leaned against the fireplace, sneering.


“It will be a gift that is incomparable and unforgettable for a lifetime.”


Sally frowned as she approached and picked up the box. What kind of bad taste could this be? What she thought was a black ribbon was actually a very thin black rope.

Tying the farewell gift with the rope from the storage cabinet in the torture chamber. Annoyed, Sally picked up the box and turned her body right away.

"Thank you for the meaningful gift."


As she was about to slightly bow like a lady and greet the maniac wearing the mask of a gentleman, Winston's arm blocked Sally's way.




"You can't do that."
‘Why this to me.’


In Sally's mind, reason and intuition instantaneously sounded the alarm, shouting.


"It's dangerous. Run away. No, it's already too late."


The moment you take your foot off here, it's over. Escaping is soon to become the poet.


"There might still be a way out. This is just Winston's unique style of leading the conversation."


Perhaps I didn't realize that I was still making assumptions without certainty. To survive here, I needed to find the gaps in information and exploit those weaknesses.

"What is this?"


Feign ignorance. Act displeased as if receiving something strange as a gift. Although I asked with a pout, the man standing across from me was only enveloped in a dark hue, from his neck to his toes, exuding a sinister atmosphere.



I couldn't bear to lift my gaze and meet his eyes. Sally calmly read through the documents.


[Special Notice: The Last Rebel of Riedelga]


[Charges: Infiltration of military facilities, leaking of military confidential information, leading an invasion of the government....]



"Govern, please…."


[Skin color: Unknown brightness]


[Hair color: Unknown Dark Brown]


[Eye color: Unknown turquoise]


[Age: Unknown 26]


[Gender: Riddle]


As I traced back the white paper with black letters written sporadically, the color of the fingertips gripping the paper grew pale.




‘No….’





"Let me formally introduce myself. I am Leon Winston, a captain in the Domestic Intelligence Division of the Western Command, and the son of the man who was cruelly tortured to death by your mother, that devil."

“…….”


"Ah, is this a story that everyone already knows?"


Leon sneered as he looked down at the woman's heaving bosom.


"Riddle, I always wanted to meet you."


The gentle voice, as if addressing a benefactor, and the gaze that glared at an enemy felt incongruous. As the breath of rising anger warmed my ears, it tightened my throat even more.

"However, like this…."


Winston pressed his lower body tightly against hers. Something thicker than the muzzle pressed down on Grace's lower back.



"I wish it had been somewhere easily reachable."


He swept the muzzle of the gun over the buttocks of the maid he trusted, no, the cunning mistress.



“Do you know? Every time I see you, I want to shove my gun into your cramped little hole and stir it up.”

As the terrifying screams of the heavy iron door faded away, a faint sobbing could be heard. When the light was turned on, the owner of the sobbing became clearly visible.

“Hello, Fred.”


Winston lightly greeted Fred, who was tied up with his limbs against one wall, and roughly pushed Grace inside.


Fred was only tied up, looking perfectly fine. It was true that Winston had revealed Grace's identity without even touching her. A mix of relief and anger surged within.

"Ugh.... Please, s-save me...."


The moment the light turned on, Fred gasped and looked up, his face pale with fear as he began to plead with Winston. Then, the moment his gaze met Grace's, he burst into tears.

"Black... Grace...."


“Don’t call my name.”


The hatred flowed out unabashedly through the jagged gaps in Grace's lips.


"You don't deserve that."


"I'm, I'm sorry. Huh…"


"Grace."


Winston, watching the two people with pleasant eyes, followed Fred and called out to her. There was a hint of mockery.



Grace stood facing Fred, her waist tightly embraced by Winston's thick arms as he forcibly held her from behind. He asked gently.



"Do I have what it takes?"


The thumping on the back was violent. Contrary to the surface, it was clear that Ija's insides were far from calm.


"No, it seems that there isn't."


As their bodies became more closely pressed together, goosebumps arose. However, Grace was unable to resist, bound to Winston’s wall-like body like Fred, whose limbs were tied to the wall.

"Being the last heir of a well-known gangster family, it's a great insult to be assigned a rookie like that."


"I'm, I'm sorry...."


While Winston threatened the two, Fred, who had only been sobbing unclear words, apologized once again with a completely useless apology.

Grace desperately held back the urge to slap Fred's face.


"I opposed it from the beginning."


Fred weakly lowered his head, as if he understood what was said with the eyes.


Fred was not suited for espionage. Jimmy knew that as well. However, the pressure from Fred's father, who hoped that his only son would achieve great things, was not easy to bear, regardless of whether he was timid or not.

Jimmy, who had recently taken over the position of Commander-in-Chief in place of his deceased father, could not help but be aware of the elders' scrutiny.

"Don't worry, it will fall."


Jimmy paradoxically hoped that the enemy army would resolve this difficult situation. In other words, he expected that Fred would fail to pass his basic training.

But how surprised Fred was when he passed the basic training.


And how absurd it was when I was assigned to the torture chamber because of Fred's father's scheme, who wrote 'butcher' as his occupation on the enlistment application.

I told him to quit the mismatched job, even now, but Fred was as stubborn as my father. Even while complaining, he insisted that he could do it.

I thought I could trust it because it seems to be gradually getting used to it...


Leon looked down at Grace's trembling little fist and whispered cruel words in her ear.


“Riddle, surely you’re not trying to leave the mansion with the comrade still in the torture chamber, forgetting your duties? I’ve told you time and again. You do your work, and I’ll do mine.”

Winston's job was to torture the spy, while Grace's job was to obstruct him.



“…You want me to do my work here now?”
The nickname of the vampire of Camden was by no means an exaggeration.


As the sound of bloodsucking continued starkly, Fred, with his limbs bound, wanted to cover his ears but was unable to do so.



The painful, tightly shut eyelids of Grace fluttered. In front of a scene reminiscent of a vampire movie he had seen sometime ago, Fred trembled.

"Ah!"


“Haah….”


The moment the tightly pressed lips broke apart with a loud sound, pained moans and excited breaths intersected.


“Um….”


From the lips soaked in blood and saliva, a moan filled with lust flowed out, one that anyone could hear.


Winston tightly held Grace as if she were his own. The arm wrapped around her waist climbed along her curves and squished her full breasts. It was clearly visible that the round flesh beneath the maid's uniform was being mercilessly flattened.



"Huh, don't do this here…"


The vampire of Camden ignored Grace's pleas and buried its head in the nape of her neck again, only lifting its eyes to glare at Fred.



The eyes that once burned with intense anger were no longer there. A vulgar joy glimmered in the unfocused gaze.


In that moment, Fred realized too late what Winston was asking Grace for in return.


"Ha, don't do that."


The devil seeks to defile his saint.


With great difficulty, Fred mustered the courage to plead amidst the sounds of clashing. However, as Winston did not cease to tease Grace even a little, the pleas soon turned into threats.

"You told me to stop!"



Leon chuckled.
"To be honest, tell me. Did you receive orders to seduce me and extract information?"


Although the woman shook her head, Leon, realizing it was a lie, tightened his grip even more.


"Ugh, breath...."


"You said something like that on the pool table that day too. Do you think I'm so naive that I can be fooled twice?"


The woman’s face turned bright red in an instant as she scraped his hand with her fingernails. However, due to a greater fury, Leon felt no pain at all.

His constant hovering in front of him, the way he seemed to please his heart, and the fact that he occupied his bathtub naked in the middle of the night were all just a scheme of seduction.

"You must have found me so ridiculous watching me, right? A foolish little guy who doesn't even know if you're an enemy."



It was humiliating to be deceived by the cunning schemes of the spy. Everything I had done, driven by my obsession with this woman, felt even more wretched.

"Did you think you could run away without properly completing the task of spreading your legs for me? What a pathetic spy."



At the moment when her vision flickered and everything went dark, the hand that had been choking Grace suddenly released its grip. Stumbling, she fell heavily to the ground. Grace gasped for breath, barely aware of the pain of hitting the hard floor.



“Haah, haah….”


"Fortunately for you, I'm still the stupid bastard who gets set up by the enemy."


Grace raised her head. A black demon, silhouetted against the light just a step ahead, stood tall. In her vision, which was blackened in places as if suffocated, the centrally rising horns were clearly visible.

"Miss Grace Reedle, you must complete the mission."


As she felt the chilling madness in Winston's smile, Grace shuddered and tightly closed her eyes.


Amidst the rustling sound of clothes being removed, Winston asked with a mocking voice.


"You teach women how to use their charm, right?"



Even malicious accusations should have some limits. We are not as ugly as the piglets of your monarchy.
“Are you going to do it if I don't?”


The sense of betrayal, which could not be filtered through the voice, came through clearly.


“Sniff... I’m really, really sorry.”


"If you're sorry to me, don't tell anyone about this."


I hope Fred keeps quiet. So that no one knows about this shameful incident.


At least Jimmy hoped not to know. He would blame himself for putting Grace into the cave as soon as I bought her.


On the one hand, I was also scared. If Jimmy thinks I'm disgusting for being with another man, especially an enemy... If he abandons me...



"No, he's not that kind of person. He loves me. Jimmy loves me. He loves me, but right now I'm with that filthy bastard..."



With a heart full of despair, I kept repeating the same words like a mantra when Winston, with Fred's eyes covered by a blindfold, approached. As he bent down, Grace clenched her teeth.

"Baby, why are you so down?"


In the warm embrace, Grace trembled even more.


"Is it cold? I haven't taken off my clothes yet. Not yet."


At the end of the worried words, a mean smile lingered. Winston stood Grace up and sat down on a metal chair meant for newspapers.



Due to the slouching posture as she perched on the edge of the chair, Grace's shoe was touching the inside of his shoe, even though they were three steps apart.

His head tilted at an angle. Winston simply watched Grace while touching his temple with the tip of his index finger, without any requests or orders.

"Please…. No, it can't be…."


The uncomfortable silence persisted, with only Fred's sobs ringing in the air.



Winston quietly and persistently scanned Grace's body like a predator about to pounce on its prey.
"Ah…."


The moment my legs lost their strength and I staggered, I instinctively reached out my hand and tightly closed my eyes. However, the place where Grace fell was not a cold floor, but a hot body.

"Did you go?"


"Ugh, no."


"Our dear, it's going easily."


Grace, momentarily forgetting her circumstances due to the heat that clouded her senses, pushed against his chest.

However, to Leon, it was merely an adorable little tantrum.


"Ah, ouch... it hurts."


Leon embraced the woman who sat down on his knee with her legs wide open, as if to crush her. Despite the layers of fabric between them, he could vividly feel the softness of her body, sending shivers of uncontrollable joy through him.



What on earth are you?


She was still a mystery. The cunning spy who deceived him. The daughter of the enemy who killed his father. That alone could not explain the reasons that only pertained to her.

Leon grabbed the woman's buttocks with both hands. As he pulled her close, her genitals, covered only by a thin layer of bloomers, pressed against his center. His hands began to roughly knead her buttocks as the coarse friction started.



"Huh…."


The genitalia didn't directly touch. However, every time the bent pillar of flesh trapped inside the clothes brushed against her skin with a soft, soft bump, Grace felt as if she was already being stripped bare and subjected to it.

The aftermath of climax sent a tingling thrill through the sensitive spot. Grace trembled all over, just as she had in the moment of being violated with the shoes.

"Ha... I really feel it."


Leon rubbed his body against hers, exhaling hot breaths. Every time he exerted force below, the woman couldn’t withstand the stimulation and twisted her body. She was grinding her genitals against the man's body. It was no different from a female dog unable to contain her heat.



"I received proper training."
That kiss from my childhood was not bittersweet. It was simply thrilling.


Grace, who found herself in a situation that seemed similar yet completely different, was in despair. Did she encounter a monster in her childhood, or did she create one?

"Uhm..."


If this continues without drawing blood, I might try to tear my lips even more. Just as Winston wiped his swollen lower lip and was about to bite down again, Grace boldly pushed her tongue through the gap in his parted lips.

Soon the kiss became rather mundane. Holding each other's napes and cheeks, their tongues tangled as if to devour one another, it was no different from the passionate kisses of any lovers. If only the man hadn’t been holding a dagger in his right hand.



Grace slowly pulled Winston's long protruding tongue. Finally, the tongue detached from the puckered lips, and a long thread of saliva stretched between the two.

"Haah, first…."


Winston pointed to Grace's chest with eyes that seemed to have quenched a fair amount of thirst.


"I need to check if it's correct."


It was the sound of wanting to confirm if the nipple was pink.


He did not touch Grace's clothes. He just waited with his chin propped sideways.


It meant to take it off yourself.


Grace glared at Winston as she lowered the straps of her apron. She tried hard to appear composed, but her hand, unbuttoning the buttons that ran from the collar of her black maid's uniform down to her waist, trembled slightly.

Each time the front opened slowly, the man's gaze on Grace became more dangerous. Watching the increasingly slanted corners of his mouth, it seemed as if this man was happy because she was a spy.

“Ah, don’t!”


It was just at the moment of unbuttoning the first button of the blouse. Winston grasped the collar of the blouse with both hands and pulled it apart. With a tearing sound, the fabric ripped, and white buttons flew in all directions.

Leon, who shrugged off the blouse and maid's outfit all at once below his shoulders, scoffed. A white bra that showed no hint of seduction. Now that he thought about it, the bra had been white when he had taken it off at the billiard table too.

"Go ahead. Do as you please. Please don’t ask."


As she urged for an answer with even more shameful words, the woman clenched her teeth and whispered an unnecessary permission through trembling lips.

"You're saying to do as one pleases. That sounds very dangerous."


I knew what he would do. He added this as he moistened his twisted lips with his tongue. Grace gasped for breath and turned her head to the side.

"Look closely."


Leon grabbed the woman's chin and turned her to face him. As he met her eyes, which were increasingly filled with contempt and shame, he slowly lowered his head. Just before his lips touched the protruded nipple, the corners of the woman's eyes were tinged with a lovely pink hue.


It was the color of a nipple.


"Uh...."


The moment the woman squeezed her eyes shut, Leon eagerly sank his teeth into the trembling blush-colored flesh.


The soft texture was similar to that of lips. If he had to compare which one he liked better, he would choose the flesh that he was teasingly tormenting with the tip of his tongue.

It was satisfying to honestly respond to the lascivious teasing. Unlike its master, the nipple could not lie. The flesh that had only been soft suddenly swelled up thickly and became hard and firm.

It looked like something good to suck. When Leon deeply sucked on the flushed-colored areola, the woman writhed and moaned.



“Ah...”


With a sticky, damp tongue, I licked the round bump. It felt like rolling a plump, ripe raspberry inside my mouth.


Will it release juice if bitten?


“Ah!”


The sound of a thud. The soft flesh was pressed down, and at that moment, the handcuffs clashed against the armrest. The woman's limbs trembled. One untouched breast swayed significantly up and down.


"It hurts. Don't bite."
"I'm doing this with the permission of my body’s owner, so does the fiancé have the right to question me, or just some random guy? What do you think, darling?"

The hand that had been clutching her chest traveled up along her collarbone and nape, caressing her face in an eerily affectionate manner. Grace shuddered at the tone and actions typical of someone treating a lover.

"Huh? Riddle, do you think you have the right to blame me for selling you out to a traitor?"


As Winston teased his earlobe, urging for a response, Grace shook her head briefly.


"Then tell that guy clearly."


Grace squeezed her eyes shut once and asked Fred for a favor.


"Fred, please shut up."


But Fred, whose reason was already paralyzed, did not listen.


“Please don’t do that and let that guy go….”


He shook his head at Grace's plea. As he continued to glare at Fred, who kept screaming, one might think he was trying to threaten him or silence him, but Winston was not that reasonable a person.

"Have you ever made him blush?"


Grace shook her head with a look of disgust. A twisted smile appeared on Winston's face.


“Oh dear… I suppose I’m doing something quite cruel right now.”


Winston picked up the heavy flesh in his hands and began to lick down the cleavage. Soon, the flesh began to rub against each other, making a sticky and strange sound.

“Wh-what are you doing right now?”


"torture."


It was to make a more peculiar sound for Fred to hear. Grace, shaking with humiliation, struggled to escape from his grasp.



"Ugh..., please stop."



But it was impossible with her hands tied. Grace had to endure the disgusting things Winston was doing.
The thick thumbs and index fingers dug under her chin and lifted her body up. She struggled and tried to pull away, but it was a futile effort. The metal rings of the handcuffs dug even deeper into her wrists.

“Gah….”


The eyes, gleaming with fierce madness, gradually grew dim.


"Was your fiancé that bastard?"


The hand gripping her neck was visibly trembling. Even the voice spat out through clenched teeth was shaking, sending chills down Grace's entire body.

"Ugh... please... save me."


Grace felt deep in her bones that the anger he had shown until now was nothing at all.


"To send me a woman to marry. Have they looked down on me as someone who can't even act like a man?"

Everyone knew that there were rumors going around about him having such obsessive cleanliness regarding his relationships with women. Both Winston himself and the leadership of the revolutionary army.

It wasn't entirely wrong to say that he underestimated him and sent his fiancée away. Jimmy had once mentioned believing that rumor and infiltrating Grace.

"Even so, when I set this up and charged in, it must have been quite bewildering."


That wasn't incorrect either.


“So, did you do it with that guy?”


"Thud…."


"Are you asking if I did it with that kid?!"


A fierce cry echoed in the torture chamber. There was no trace of rationality in the icy cold eyes that penetrated to the bone.



“Ah, ah….”


There was no voice. Grace shook her head urgently, her face flushed bright red.



"Me?"
“Ah!”


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


"Ugh!"


The flesh column was thrust all the way up to the throat in an instant. The blunt and heavy mass of flesh poked sharply at the end of the hole, and at that moment, Grace gagged.

“Uh….”


As Winston bit down, a thick groan escaped him, his throat constricting. The flesh, which was blocking the path of his struggling breath, oozed out, crushing the delicate mucous membranes.

"Haah, eup…."


There was no time to catch my breath. The moist rod, soaked thickly with Grace's saliva, slipped back down my throat. Tears flowed.



“Uhm, um….”


I can't breathe. It's disgusting. I feel like I might vomit.


Winston roughly teased Grace while gripping the back of her head tightly.


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


The act of violating a woman was reminiscent of a torturer's technique. When entering, it was forceful, and when pulling out, it dragged slowly from the root of the tongue to the tip. Every movement was a source of anguish.

The length measured by the mouth seemed endless. Since Winston was holding the root in his hand, it hadn't all come in yet. Nevertheless, the thought that such a threatening object would be lodged all the way inside me made my vision go dark.



"Hmm..."


Grace resisted and pleaded with all her might. Winston's two legs, standing tall like pillars, didn't budge no matter how much she pushed and hit them.

Though I looked up at him with pleading eyes, clutching the belt, he merely gazed down at me with cold anger and burning desire in his eyes.


“Um, heeum….”
Are you giving me time to catch my breath? Or has this disgusting act finally come to an end?


Winston pulled the chair over again and sat in front of Grace.


"Ha, uhm..."


It was foolish to expect even a trace of mercy from the interest. I had to be grabbed by the nape again and bury my face in Winston's groin.



"Now it's your turn to suck."


Winston forced the tip of his genitals into Grace's mouth, like he was making the baby suck on a pacifier, dripping a transparent liquid. The moment the hot and soft flesh entered her mouth, feelings of humiliation and anger surged once again.



But she could not overcome the weight of resignation and despair. Just as Winston had with her chest, he rolled his tongue against her hot flesh. The taste of acrid lust spread across his tongue.

“A little deeper.”


As a large hand pressed down on the back of her head, half of the penis slipped inside. Grace squeezed her eyes shut and flicked her tongue.

The skin felt smooth and soft to the tongue, but inside it was heavy and solid, like metal. It was a feeling I never wanted to know.



Winston, who had been propping his chin at an angle and observing with bored eyes, let out a long sigh of discontent.



"Not even a kitten lapping up milk from a dish. Did your fiancé teach you to suck like this without any effort? That guy, what a terrible instructor."

As Winston pushed Grace's forehead away, a wet column of flesh sprang out of her mouth.


"Did that thing get trained to suck like this? You must have at least tried sucking it."


"Haah, I've never done something like this. And training since earlier? Nonsense, ugh…"


Leon, who had obtained the information he wanted, no longer needed to listen to the woman. He again placed his genitals in the woman's mouth.

"I didn’t train my bride to be a prostitute, huh? That's disappointing. I guess I have a lot to teach her."



He carefully gathered the hair of Grace, which had come undone and was flowing down, with gentle hands.
The moment resignation was uttered, the mischief in the light blue eyes disappeared.


Whip. Winston threw the dagger he was holding in his hand.


"Ugh!"


Fred let out a sharp scream.


"What should I do? That guy can't do it?"


Grace's face turned pale as she turned her head. The dagger was deeply embedded in the center of Fred's groin.


"What are you doing, you crazy person, ah!"


Winston fiercely grabbed Grace, who was shouting rough words in shock.


Grace realized it only when she faced the crazed eyes once again, just like when Jimmy's story came up.


If I were to name that madness, would it be better to call it twisted possessiveness?


This man wasn't simply violating her out of humiliation and a desire for revenge. Why did he keep asking why she was with Jimmy? Why was the expression on this guy's face so cold when he saw Fred aroused by her? The situation was so confusing that it slipped by.



This man wanted to monopolize her.


"Why not pick up something that's been cut in half and shove it in?"


"Ugh, I don't need it. I never meant that I wanted to do it with that guy."


"What did that mean?"


"I'll do anything you tell me to."


Winston's expression softened a little.


"Then you said you would save me. At this rate, I will die from blood loss."


"Our things that we need to take care of are only mine."


Winston poked at his erect penis with his fingertips, pressing it down. It was a sound urging him to suck it again.

"A woman who sells her body for payment. So, you are a prostitute."


“Gulp….”


A faint sob leaked through the gaps of entwined flesh. Leon let out a satisfied sigh and gently stroked the woman's head.



"Keep it down, darling. There are other people around."


Fred's scream had long since stopped.


Finish it quickly. Please finish it quickly. For that guy, and for me, finish it quickly.


Shame aside for a moment, how many times did I flick my tongue and hands as the devil taught me, shaking my head quickly? My already hard member began to stiffen even more and twitch.

Grace did not know its meaning.


Winston, who had not said anything despite only half-heartedly biting and sucking, suddenly pressed down hard on the back of the head. In a moment of carelessness, his penis was pulled in.

He pulled Grace's hands off the base and tried to push the pillar of flesh all the way in. When it got stuck in his throat, he stood up from the chair and used the tip of his member to press down on the root of his tongue to create space for it to go in. He felt a surge of nausea.



“Uhm, uhm!”


Eventually, his lips touched his lower abdomen. He swallowed this ridiculous size down to the root. The pricked throat was painful and made him nauseous, and in that moment, he was hitting Winston's thigh with his fist.

A thick liquid gushed out from the tip lodged in the mucous membrane. It was semen.


“Ugh….”


"Swallow. If you don't want to choke to death, swallow."


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


“Phew….”


Leon, after a while, loosened his grip on the back of the woman's head. When he pulled the solid mass out of the hole, a cloudy liquid mingled with saliva and stretched out long.

"Please don't kill me."


Winston commanded someone outside while sending Fred away. At that moment, Grace felt a twisted glee rather than a sense of relief that that devil had kept his promise.

Don't kill me.


As long as he doesn't die, it will be fine. In other words, it meant that Fred would be tortured. From the mouth that should say such things, only a laugh that sounded like crying came out.

"Yeah. You made me suffer, so you should suffer too."


I also had the same selfishness as Fred. Now I was beginning to find everything, including myself, repugnant.


Bang. The door closed. Click, it was the sound of the door locking.


I had hoped to be left alone, but such luck did not happen. The dull sound of footsteps grew closer.


"The deal is not over yet."


Grace closed her eyes tightly instead of responding. A hand suddenly came under her body, which was lying face down on the cold floor. Winston, who had turned her over, let out a snicker.

"Feigning fainting like a little mouse…"


I really wanted to faint just like this. But consciousness did not easily let her go.


"At first, a普通 bed would be nice."


His body suddenly rose up. Winston, like a groom carrying his bride across the threshold on their wedding night, embraced Grace and headed toward the corner's single bed.

He laid the woman on the pristine white sheets and climbed on top. Creak. The bed screamed as if it were going to break. It was not a sturdy enough bed to withstand his weight.

The woman was still acting as if she were fainting. Each time she took a shuddering breath, her breasts bulged out from between her disheveled maid's outfit and shook noticeably.

It was a masterpiece.


As I traced the indentations of his bite mark on the pink areola with my fingertips, the woman flinched. The object trapped in Leon's pants also quivered in response.

I tried to stick my pinky finger into the gap that was gaping like a nostril.


“Huh!”


"Don't move. You're being torn apart."


Leon pressed gently on the woman's lower abdomen as she swayed her hips. He slid his fingers a little deeper into her tight, bare skin. The woman gasped for breath, struggling even to bite down on just half of her little finger.

"You sent away your fiancée without even eating."


Leon snapped his fingers and clicked his tongue.


"Jimmy Blanchard Jr. would do this much for me. I'm moved."


Winston mentioned Jimmy again. As the guilt and fear she had tried so hard to forget surged back, Grace bit her lip.

The torn area opened up again, causing sharp pain, but it was nothing compared to the pain in her heart.


He moaned as he tasted the fluid gathered at the tip of his pinky finger. To an outsider, it was the face of a noble savoring the finest wine.



"Sending a gift that suits my picky taste. You guys know my preferences pretty well, even when I don’t."


He took a deep breath. He seemed like a bull about to charge in excitement at the sight of red.


"Although an enemy, I want to commend his capabilities."


Winston took his hand to the knot of the tie. The black silk tie slipped loose and hung neatly on the iron railing at the foot of the bed. Next was the pin that fastened his shirt collar. He removed the golden pin and placed it neatly on the table at the foot of the bed.



Grace helplessly watched as Winston took off his clothes, exposing her genitals as if on display.


Despite having a serious expression like a priest solemnly performing a sacred ritual before an important task, the gaze looking down at the offering was anything but reverent.

The long fingers started to unbutton the shirt one by one. As the hem of the shirt opened, the chest beneath it swelled up and it was clearly visible as it deflated.

The wrinkle-free shirt, folded in half, was hung next to the tie. Next to it, a black belt was soon hung, and as Winston spread the front of his pants, a bronze-colored pillar of flesh sprang out.


The penis was erect, veins bulging ominously, as if the previous events had never occurred.
The corners of his mouth were tilted askew. In Grace's eyes there was mockery, but in reality it was a wistful smile.


Something was lacking. Upon reflection, the imagined 'Sally' screamed when he committed the act. This woman seemed overly subdued, perhaps having already lost her fighting spirit.

"Then say something like this. You know the words that Sally, whom I cherished so much, used to say every time she brought out the food."

Enjoy your meal, Captain.


"I wanted to knock you down at the dining table every time you said that and gobble you up."


What is this person trying to mock her for? Grace shouted with gritted teeth.


"Eat deliciously and fall into hell, Aah!"


Leon snapped his waist sharply. The blunt tip drove into the ground, tearing the flesh that had been pushing him taut.



The waists of the two people bent backwards at the same time. Their lower bodies shuddered as one. The man and woman, standing at the extremes of pain and pleasure, contorted their faces and moaned together.

"Oh, it hurts, ugh..."


“Ugh, it's too, sigh, narrow….”


Even without that, my body was already too tight to accommodate him, and I was trying to push out even what I had barely managed to insert, as my insides contracted.

"Relax."


"Ouch! Please stop!"


"Stay still."


I'm sorry, I can't assist with that.


There was no end. It's all in now. It's really all in now. Every time he believed that, the man would mock her by thrusting his hips down, and the trajectory of the burning pain lengthened even more.


Grace pleaded as she pushed away the chest of the man who was thrusting a stake between my legs.
The mucous that had been stuck to the flesh fell off with a crackling sound. The woman jerked her body sharply.


As soon as it was pulled out to the end, I felt a sense of emptiness. The woman's map also looked just as empty. The hole that had been the size of a needle was now wide open to match his thickness. The red, inflamed flesh flinched visibly.



"Haah..."


The moment my gaze fell on the droplets of blood clinging to the tip of the spear, my heart raced. He was always excited by blood, but the joy that the blood from this woman, which could only be shed once in a lifetime, brought was overwhelming.



Leon embraced the crying woman tenderly. Holding the tears gathered in the corners of his eyes on his lips, he let out a heated sigh.



The tears, containing the pain of being conquered by him, were incredibly sweet.


"Damn it...."


It may be a crazy thought to do so to the daughter of the enemy and the agent who insulted him, but the woman felt quite lovable.



So well trained that I want to keep it by my side.


This time, I softly whispered while kissing the torn corners of my mouth, due to sucking on something burdensome.


"Grace Reedle, you are mine now."


At that moment, the woman abruptly turned her head and rejected the kiss.


The woman was still caught in an illusion. That she had not been conquered by him.


There is a long way to go until taming. Leon decided to walk that path willingly and with great joy.


"Oh!"


The exposed penis was plunged into the end of the vagina in an instant.


"Miss Lidyl, how do you feel about having the beginning you saved taken away by the despised royal pig?"



Leon Winston was a master of torture. He knew all too well how to violate not just Grace's body but also her soul.
I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


Tears overflowed from Grace's eyes as she was forced to watch the lewd scene.


I couldn't believe that the body connected to Winston was mine. As if reading her feelings, he raised his voice and shouted.



"Look closely. Right now, the greedy piglet of the monarchy is devouring you."


"Hah!"


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.

Haah... Riddle.”


“Ah, ah… Ha, stop, ugh, please, ah!”


"Blanchard's whore, and the first man of the whore whom the upper management cherished the most. It is an immense honor for me."



He ties her hands with a tie as Grace covers her ears.


"I've heard that one cannot forget their first experience. Even if I want to forget tonight, I will do my best to make it a memory I can never forget for the rest of my life."

"Stop!"


I already wanted to forget.


"Winston, please stop, sob…."


"Oh dear.... If by chance Riddle has his wedding night with his fiancée, be careful not to call my name then. It would

be very rude."


When he brought up Jimmy again, Grace was furious.


"I will kill you, you devil! If I ever succeed in the revolution, it will be I who brings the guillotine's blade down on your neck."



"Then can I ask for Grace Riddle, which was my favorite meal in the past, as the last meal for the death row inmate?"

"That's strange! Please, ha, ha, don't."


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


The thick fingertips, swollen red, gently spread the fluid. It was a slow friction, but the genitalia convulsed quickly.


"Chew moderately. You say you don't want to get pregnant? You seem determined to pull it out."


“Uh….”


Grace's ears did not hear his mockery. She buried her face between her tied arms and wrestled with a sensation she had never felt before.



A strong urge to burst something from the cruelly crushed genitals and fingers of Winston surged intensely.


No. No.


Not knowing what it was, Grace trembled in fear and tried to endure it. However, the opponent would not allow her to endure.



Another hand joined in. A large hand greedily grasped and teased the breast that had been pressed outwards, unable to bear being caught between Grace's body and the mattress.

The sound of kneading soft flesh was loud. Every time he thrust his hips, it scraped against the thick sheet, pushing the sore nipples into the flesh, even digging into them with his fingertips.

"Ahhh!"


"Yeah, it feels good, doesn't it?"


The damp lips sucked on the earlobe, and a cruel whisper spilled forth in a voice that seemed to hiss like a serpent.


"Honey, go. It's okay. Your fiancé will forgive you."


He stimulated both her erogenous zones and her guilt, pushing Grace to the brink.


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


It squirmed like a living lump of flesh deep within the belly. Squish squish. A thick head noisily pounded against the tender flesh, thumping and banging.

It felt incredibly like being in heaven. The face of the devil looking at me gently while kissing her bare shoulder appeared almost like an angel.

I'm crazy.


The moment the devil smiled with joy, my senses were fully awakened.


"Sniff…"


"To be defeated by the enemy and leave like that. What a pathetic soldier."


The elite soldier was not here.


Having been violated by a man she despised and not only experiencing pleasure but also actively moving her waist, she now truly felt like a whore.

The shame, stripped not only of the body but also of the mind, was overwhelming. I could no longer endure it.


I don't know. Now I don't know either.


As Winston let go of the limp body, it collapsed onto the mattress with a thud. The sensation of life draining away left the body trembling once again from the lingering irritation.

The penis sprang up, scattering fluid everywhere. Clear droplets fell onto the maid's dress and the bed sheets, leaving stains.



“Uh….”


As soon as it escaped from the woman's body, the tip of the penis began to ooze out a thick, concentrated liquid.

Leon's buttocks, which had been hollowed out from holding back his climax, relaxed.


“Haah….”


A dizzying climax swept through my entire body. The mind, clouded by carnal desires, gradually became clearer.

Only then did the chaotic surroundings catch my eye.


The woman lying sprawled as if dead twitched with every gasp, her once pale skin losing its color and becoming a pink hue like exposed flesh, shuddering with spasms. The semen he expelled clung together in lumps between her torn bloomers and the crease of her hips.



Seeing that filthy sight, my lower body felt stiff again, and my animalistic instincts surfaced.



"Damn it..."
It was actually him who became aroused. No matter how many times he ejaculated, he became erect again right away. The intercourse, which was no different from the mating of beasts, continued without a moment's rest.

I couldn't tell how many times I had sucked out the remaining semen with my mouth. By then, it no longer felt repulsive. I had given up counting how many shameful climaxes I had experienced after the twelfth.

Underneath the beast, in the midst of the swaying that made my vision spin, I recalled an embarrassingly scandalous article in a tabloid I had seen on the train about a year ago while on my way to Winston. It said that lions mate up to 100 times a day during their mating season.


Suddenly, I remembered that the man's name meant "lion," and I chuckled. Laughing while being assaulted. I wasn't in my right mind.



Winston also seemed out of his mind. Looking at his dazed eyes, he resembled a person under the influence of drugs.



The man, who always seemed precise and exact, was now disheveled.


Winston, who usually had a sophisticated and elegant noble's face, spewed vulgar words that one might expect from a back-alley thug at Grace. Although the content was crude, Winston had never used vulgar expressions, so Grace was quite surprised.



What she knew of Leon Winston was not the end of it. The vanguard of the revolutionaries trusted most by the royal family, the epitome of arrogant nobility, and the cruel vampire of Camden greedily sucked at the woman's breast, making indecent noises.



I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


"You're pretty."


He whispered gently to her as if treating her like a lover, placing the tip of his penis in her mouth.


How did a man who never hid a painting under the bed suddenly turn into a sexual predator? Grace asked me again.



‘Did I meet a monster or create one?’


The female beast continued even as it lost consciousness. How many times did I sob after realizing that I had woken from a nightmare only to find myself in an even more horrific nightmare?

“Eek….”


As Grace's singing gradually turned into a metallic sound, he continued to hammer away while feeding her water with his mouth.

I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


I don't know how many times I have felt this ultimate sensation. The pleasure I knew until now was not pleasure at all.



It felt like a sense of liberation, as if I had released the shackles that had bound my ankles for a lifetime, while at the same time feeling an uncomfortable sensation as if new shackles had been fastened in that very place.

The more I tried, the more my reason deteriorated instead of returning. Just a little while ago, I was unable to resist the urges that had tormented me all night and was about to release myself at the cervical opening, only to regain my senses at the last moment.



Even so, I did something quite dangerous.


Now, a white lump fell down into the opening that was wide and wouldn’t close, just as thick as he was. He scratched it out with his hand and clicked his tongue.

"Reproductive desire, indeed. There's no different from a beast."


Could it be that losing reason repeatedly is due to the woman's scent? Overwhelmed by the smell of blood, sweat, and her body that exuded the scent of his semen, Leon collapsed.

“Haah, Grace Riddle. You smell good.”


He had not lifted his body for quite some time. Grace had to endure the full weight of Hoohee beneath the well-trained soldier's body.



After enduring a few kisses that made his head spin and a few touches that made him gasp with a voice strained to its limits, Winston finally rose from his position.

"Stay still."


He headed to the bathroom attached to the torture chamber, leaving Grace tied to the bed rail with a rope. The sound of water followed, as if someone was taking a shower.

All that Grace, who had been thrown onto the bed like a rag, could do was to curl her legs for a few hours.


The torn bra could no longer be used. I wanted to cover my chest with a blouse or maid's outfit, but I didn't even want to touch the clothes. My skin was sticky, and the maid's outfit was completely soaked from being splattered countless times.



“……”



I thought I might cry when it ended. As it turns out, that was a very optimistic expectation. I didn't even have the
"I don't care about that. Please, I've done everything you wanted. What do you want to gain by trampling on me like this? Let's make a deal again. Okay? There must be something else you can get from me."

Leon grit his teeth. He couldn't hear the comments that followed the words "it doesn't matter."


"Riddle, even if that child generously marries you, please do not wear a white wedding dress."


“……”


"You are no longer pure now."


He reached out to Grace, who was glaring at him. His soft thumb gently caressed the cheek that was roughly dried with tears and semen. From between his lips, which held an elegant smile, flowed a hideous word.

"Then I'll go and dye it bright red for you. Got it?"


Grace was confused. What on earth does this man want?


She acted as if she only wanted the body, but even when given the body, she was not satisfied. Because she wanted to humiliate her as much as possible, even when I willingly let it happen, she would immediately act like she was the one who was humiliated.



He knew that this was not a public arrest but a private revenge. However, he could not shake off the intuition that there was something beyond mere vengeance in his exceedingly personal feelings.

"Did you really like me?"


It was a ridiculous thought. It seems she hasn't noticed her other identity yet.


"The only white that suits you is this."


Winston raised one side of Grace's chest as if to show it well. On the nipple, stained with lipstick marks, his still wet semen had gathered.



"You match very well."


He smiled and turned his back.


“Please, Winston! Captain, please!”


I know it’s useless to beg. Yet my mind went blank, and I followed him to the door, clinging to him. I even embarrassed myself by calling him "Captain."



